exquisite jewel. On the cusp of womanhood, the talented weaver must decide whether to save her family from financial ruin, or follow her heart. Thrust into the hands of Aleksander Othman, a ruthless warlord eager to manipulate her gift and steal her virtue, Katarina must spin a heap of straw into a stack of
This is not news; in fact, it has been the cause of parental angst for decades.
We have a fantastic Sponsor this week!!!
Are there any alphabet books that have really worked for you? Leave a comment - I'd love to hear what they are!
Mark made a couple of picnic tables to take up some room. And he sold one!
Micheal Bay fails to repeat the trick with his second film about shape-shifting space-robots. Eye-wateringly stupid and agonisingly lengthy. See also: X-Men Origins: Wolverine, Terminator Salvation.
“Things are hard now but you are being refined…through the fire you’ll come out a precious stone, a refined diamond, a fierce sapphire.”
FACT: This story was originally set in New Orleans, and the food-obsessed Androgums were created with the city’s cooking reputation in mind.
“More than 20 mortar shells were fired from across the border. Three shells slammed into a paramilitary Frontier Corps checkpost in Angoor Adda area,” he added.
Place: Patuxent River, near Solomons, Maryland
3) Combine flour, baking soda, baking powder and salt in a separate bowl.
I had to serve them, clear their table, wash their plates and cutlery and also settle the bill for them. How cool was that?!!
But was a huge help to my diet and helped shrink my stomach!! Hey you got to look for the positives!
Home is so much more than this dwelling on 10 mountain-top acres.
Saurel-Cubizolles MJ, Hays M, Estryn-Behar M. Work in operating rooms and pregnancy outcome among nurses. Int Arch Occup Environ Health. 1994; 66: 235-241.
A thief, new-cutted fre a rape,
and i so hope you have gone to visit them!
22.) “When I was 5 years old, my mother always told me that happiness was the key to life. When I went to school, they asked me what I wanted to be when I grew up. I wrote down ‘happy.’ They told me I didn’t understand the assignment, and I told them they didn’t understand life.”― John Lennon
The Economist – from the print edition, 11/19/2011
The project, initially estimated at less than RM2 billion, more than doubled to RM4.6 billion by 2007. But Dr Chua also insisted MCA is anti-graft “which is why we never demonstrate when our leaders are charged,” an apparent reference to PR’s assembly outside the court here when Opposition Leader Datuk Seri Anwar Ibrahim faced the verdict for his sodomy trial on January 9.
Richard-"What the hell were you thinking?! What are we supposed to do now?!"
now I'm not sure what happened with my entry at the site as it didnt appear...glitch with blogger me thinks. But anyways I got to play with the gorgeous Teddy Bea image from Teddy Bo where she is picking strawberries...yum!!!
Paypal tried to tell me that the email saying that I'd received £800 didn't come from them. So how can they explain the £800 in my Paypal account?
I Googled "Black Pug" images to give me inspiration. Thank God for the internet! Here are the Copics I used:
Now, I do try to tackle the things that need attention and I do desire my home to be clean, presentable and comfortable, but on the other hand I don't mind a nice lived-in look either. I'm going to clean and straighten up before Mom comes but I'm not going to kill myself or make my kids ragged before grandma comes either. So I will do my best, then put on my rose-colored glasses to my home and enjoy the time with my guest.
Malpractice Insurance: (Current as of date of registration;consult attorney for further information)
Ugh, another 20 something girl. When will New Who show some diversity?
Once again, American ingenuity trumps all.
In a struggle to learn to overcome her fiery temper and selfish spirit, Ruth is led to the discovery of a very important Shepherd who can and does teach her how to be good. The story contains beautiful and uplifting examples of what can happen when we let ourselves be found by Him.
Everyone has that album that makes him or her feel good. It’s their go-to “hard times are comin’, the devils hot on my trail” music.
6. The outfit for the cocktail party will be knowledge of my skills and accomplishments, paired with confidence and genuine desire to get involved, wrapped up in a cute black dress by Nanette Lepore that says “professional”, “young” AND “creative”. And it has pockets for easy access to my business cards (one of Judith’s tricks), on the back of which I will write the name of the event that I will be attending, so that maybe the people to whom I give cards will remember who the hell I am (another of Judith’s tricks).
If you haven't heard about Something Like Fate, you're seriously are missing out. Since while this isn't my favorite book by her, it's still one addicting and fast paced fun of a novel that I can't help but suggest as one of your May must buys!
I have gotten myself into a bad nanny situation. It started off great and I loved my job and loved the children but suddenly things spiraled downwards. The family took their children for a week long vacation overseas and did not tell me about this in the original contract. Which the trip was 2 months after I first started. I feel a though they knew in advance. I was told a month before and it wasn't til the week before that I was sat down to discuss what would happen with my pay.
I don’t agree with everything this book says, and sometimes, the British perspective—which goes unchallenged by the book, and I assume, is meant to be challenged by the reader—seems like Forster’s opinions: too many lying, swindling Indians, too many insects, too hot a weather. Then I like this book for how angry and passionate it makes me and the discussions in class amuse me. Sometimes, I like this book for how it removes the Oriental exoticism from India. At other times, I like this book because I like reading about places that are not London or New York.
Varies, on fingertips typically on edges or ends of hair before styling.
I know I can be guilty of wishing people would understand life the way I do. I'll get frustrated when people don't take care of their precious bodies, I'll be confused as to why people don't see the truly important things in life. I'll wonder why people waste so much time worrying. But how can I expect someone to stand in my shoes if they've never lived in them? I've learned to take care of my body from many hospitalizations and seeing the repercussions of not doing so. I've learned to appreciate good health from having poor health. How can I expect someone to learn the lesson I did when I learned it the hard way? I've learned to appreciate the little things like the laughs with friends and moments with family. How can I expect someone to see it how I do when these things have become so important because they are what keep me going? I've learned to let my life fall as it may, not dwelling too much on small problems when I have bigger things to worry about. How can I expect others to see this when what may seem small to me, may actually feel very significant to them?
Dixons Retail plc, one of Europe’s largest specialist electrical retailing and services companies, announced namely on 2011, June the 30 th, that Pixmania has signed an agreement with Carrefour to develop its non-food internet offer.
But what is more surprising is that over the past decade, the price rises you find for these 33 commodities are just about beyond the realm of possibility 2, 3, and 4 standard deviations away from trend. It is a boom without any precedent. Quite simply, nothing even close has ever happened before, in any market, including hi tech bubbles and real estate bubbles.
He had his seatbelt on that tight he was bleedin’ from the hip
May this song guide me to sleep, maybe for once
and pratfalls
History, Literature, and Bible: Omnibus 1 & 2
We can just about bear to deal with you as it is. Don't become even more fucking loathsome. Your industry will collapse and you'll come knocking on my door asking for a fucking job.
Warning. some cameras with a standard sensitivity of 200 ISO can shoot at 100 ISO in extended mode. At 200 ISO the sensor can work at its optimal condition, giving its best performances, the chance to lower the iso to 100 is just an option useful to shoot in situation of high lighting condition, when we don't want to change our time/aperture combination.
Last night, David Letterman had a guest on his show who falls all the time.
“Hey! Are you going to order something or not?”
Ronan and the Blond Haired Girl run out the back of the Trance Club, leaving the Two Thugs completely Frozen…
13. Soldiers Prayer (prod. by Stereo Phlyer)
Construction could begin by the end of the year, for a first phase completion by 2010 and a final buildout by 2016, but promised litigation to block the use of eminent domain could delay or even kill the project.
She laughs and whisks me into the room, I take a seat off to the side and look around at the 50 or so other foreigners, all speaking French. She goes to the front of room where there is a video screen set up and takes out what looks to be a remote control and announces to the class in English "WHERE IS THE NEW YORK GIRL WHO DOES NOT UNDERSTAND?" I am officially dead inside. I slowly raise my hand as all eyes are now on me, the New York girl who does not understand. She comes and gives me the remote control and tells me to push it when I see the Eiffel Tower on the video. What? Huh? Why has she given me this? Why am I the one running the video? Why do I feel special now? She starts the video, I push the green button and I jump as a loud English voice comes out of it.
Autonomie: fair trade fashion & footwear
It calls to mind the old saying 'You get what you vote for!'
I finally made it to this exhibit on Saturday with my friend Rafael and his buddy, who also happens a staffer of me old paper, the Courier. Rafael is one of the most gentlemanly men I know. Despite the fact that he’d be at my place for all of one minute, he felt it necessary to bring me a gift in the form of a case of Red Stripe. Oddly enough, this happens to be my beer of choice as of late. We’ve always seemed to be on the same beer wavelength. Spooky.
Phew... What a long entry! So there it is... Why I don't give a shit about Kony. Why I chose to be ignorant about him. Quoting Dumbledore, "Frankly, I can think of a whole host of other things I could be doing."
While looking at a case loaded with signed books from the many authors who’ve come to the shop for readings and signings, I mentioned that my friend from grad school in Alabama, Tom Franklin, had a book there. Mom promptly bought the book and the man behind the counter said he was a friend of Tommy’s too. The world is so very small.
You always knew that you would make it;
Before evening, his face, with name and all, was all over the news. “In the shocking events following the terrorist shelling at Jevenia Club two days ago, a body has been found under the ITO bridge. What’s more suspicious is that the man is a Mr. Ankur Jain, resident of Paschim Vihar, so why was his dead body in the other end of the city? Also, Ankur had been missing since the shoot-out. The police are suspicious that his death might be directly linked to the same….”
A neighbour and her daughter (a few weeks difference in age from mine) visited us last week and she was taking up pictures of animals and asking the girls to name them. The mother speaks both English and Serbian. Around here, the equivalent of 'good job' (USA) and 'well done' (UK), is bravo! .
Our private investigation company treats each case and client with total confidentiality and privacy. We are a trusted professional practicing investigative corporation based in Texas and licensed by the State of Texas in private investigation with fully licensedprivate investigators and private detectives.
RND 6: *sc in first 5 st, 2 sc in next st*, repeat around (42 stitches)
Another episode of LIFE ON THE BROADS went like this:
that’s brave bit still there see
Last week I long arm quilted Julie's quilt top at our local dealer/rental place. It is a fun quilt with a fun pinwheel like design in 1930's reproduction fabrics. I got it loaded on the rack without too many problems, but after the first time across with the long arm, I realized there was a problem. I tried to be more careful basting on the second round of quilting, but no dice. The quilt top was shifting and I had quilted in 3 small puckers. Augh!!!! I wanted to pull my hair out!!! I felt so bad that Julie had trusted me with her quilt!
Or like the full moon
What I did is simply adjust the Dreadskull concept slightly so that it doubles for wounds, not downed markers. Whereas before, Dreadskulls where used to ignore or shake off being downed, now Dreadskulls are used to keep models alive- but in a weakened, wounded condition.
But, wait, there's more! The 1970s I remember the most was the "back to nature" world of Whole Earth Catalogs, Mother Earth News, the ecology flag and those "ecology collages," which were wooden boxes with various-sized compartments and a glass top.
How do you know this person — ‘former colleague’.
so I thought I would make another one,
Doors of la mairie (town hall)
What's actually caused most of the fuss over the last few years has been the brilliantly titled flipside "Funky Bayswater". Included on the "Instro Hipsters A Go Go" compilation series specialising in sixties rock instrumentals, "Funky Bayswater" does perhaps prove that Tom Jones was indeed rather a fool to shove the band out into the street - the lead guitar work here is sizzling, and is accompanied by a tight rhythm section which has excited people on mod dancefloors in London for awhile. Occupying the same post-mod pre-hard rock hinterland that other instrumental groovers such as "Apricot Brandy" have, the track was apparently written in a few hours and recorded in a mere couple of takes, and as a result retains a lot of urgency and electricity.
Here's how you do it:
And – for those of you who do not blog but wish to join in – please post your positivity message to http://autismpositivity.wordpress.com
three years ago, and the conditions under which he is now do not
thanks so much for your patience this week
-spray painted tray
Well, here's the update.....phlblblblblblblblbphbl(that's a rasberry)! So, I have put myself out there and got nothing, nada, zilch, nil, NO LOVE......
As we turn, I see a group of young teenagers crawling out of the jeep. No one, thank god, looks hurt, although one boy is crouched on the grass of the bank, his arms above his head, swaying back and forth. The child is obviously traumatized.
Sign Holders
The crux of this picture is that Tamil migrants contribute significantly to the Sri Lankan economy. Why then spend monies in order to stem illegal outflows? There must be some unspecified quid pro quo with the Australian government. But from a staunch Sri Lankan perspective does this possible gain balance the benefits? I proclaim “No” – and will do so till the specific benefits are spelt out.
Lunch time would come, dad would hand the oldest a couple of fives and tell us to walk to the McDonald's for lunch. I remember feeling so cool that I got to walk in the city without any parents and buy my own lunch. We would pig out on burgers, fries and milkshakes making sure that we spent every last nickel knowing there was a possibility dad would ask for the change when we returned. I would freeze on the walk back to Sears, carrying my vanilla shake, making sure I got every last drop of the delicious wax-from-the cup-infused-ice cream flavored drink.
and yeah instead of garlic oil used loads of fresh garlic to flavour the oil used to fry the prawns above-
I worried that, when I eventually returned to writing novels, screenwriting would have ruined my prose style. I found that, instead, it had sharpened my ability to plot and shape a story. I felt more confident about constructing the intricate mystery of JANE WAS HERE and to keep readers turning pages.
I have a book of poems that he brought back from the war with him and some were his own but some were collections of those he heard and wanted to save. Unfortunately, I don't know which is which so I will print my two of my favorites and if they were written by someone else I would love to know.
03-03-2009
These minimums must be reviewed on an ongoing basis…to make sure that they are fair …and timely….
Sewing needle
Sample Size: 12 oz. brown bottle with gold aluminum wrap
Hello all! Welcome to Monday here on my blog. It's been awhile since I've posted here on blogger as I usually do everything on my wordpress, but I really need to start using both of them! LOL
It's useless trying to write when I'm ill, even a shopping list is too difficult. I've been holed up at home for days and not able to write because my mind is like cotton wool and I don't have the energy it takes to work at a piece of writing.
The essentials: black leggings, cute boots, a big comfy sweater, and a scarf.
patience, my friends.
4 ounces unsweetened chocolate (we used 2 ounces cocoa powder, and 2 ounces bakers chocolate, plus 2 tbsp oil)
Dad
Love from our friends and family. When Maura Moritz brought me the incredibly generous gifts and cards from Arapahoe staff members, I actually burst into tears. I couldn't believe how kind people were. Thank you, thank you, thank you. We also have friends and family who are kind enough to drive out here almost every other day, bringing us healthy food, checking on us all the time, buying us butt paste (for Sam, not for us), paying for hotel rooms, and trekking out here just to go for a run with us. The nurses keep commenting on how popular Sam is, and each time, I think about how lucky we are.
even I have fucking redie red hair! lol
Enough about me and mine. I wish you and yours a wonderful holiday season. I love that Hanukkah is overlapping Christmas this year; gonna fry up some latkes tonight. 2011 was a stinker of a year, but it went fast, ending (so far) with Boehner's bag o' toys of a cave-in.
It’s called “open carry” and it’s drawing plenty of attention from advocates and opponents alike.
Soft words spoken by soft lips
During the course of this week much attention has been made in the US media to health care legislation currently being propagated by the Obama administration with particular attention being paid to religiously affiliated institutions and their objections to provide their employees with insurance benefits inclusive of contraception.
Do you ever get into Gene v. Environment debates about intelligence or personality? I'd love to hear about your theories about how genes and environment shape our lives in the comments.
Following are excerpts from an address by leading Sunni scholar Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on Al-Jazeera TV on January 16, 2011.
The latest killings bring the number of white farmers murdered since the end of Apartheid to 3118, that is to say between three and four killings a week
Nope, not in my eyes!
Urban Survival
Ribbon Small Business Award® winners, recognizing their critical role in job creation and economic growth. The award honors their strong
Things to write down in an email TO YOURSELF:
Selfish glee: observing so many pages I had never seen. Evidence: pages I made for someone else. The Stories: priceless bonus (and favorite part of the book that never would have happened). To witness journal love by the many readers? An awesome added benefit. Being part of something that encourages artistic growth, including my own? That rocks.
chopped fresh tomatoes if you have them
Baaba Maal: Baaba Maal is a Senegalese singer and guitarist born in Podor, on the Senegal River. Baaba sings primarily in Pulaar and is the foremost promoter of the traditions of the Pulaar-speaking peoples. He has released several albums. In July 2003, Baaba was made a UNDP Youth Emissary. In March 2012 he visited Mauritania with Oxfam to call attention to the humanitarian need resulting from the food crisis in the Sahel. Also an Ambassador for Nelson Mandela’s 46664 campaign, he has become an increasingly vocal champion for the rights of women and girls.
Terry Hubbard (BNP) 244
15ml Krupnik
But as a part of the class, they responded to questions on a Google doc, and their responses make for interesting reading in themselves, so I thought I would share selections.
But saving herself is the least of her problems if she doesn’t stop the coming apocalypse. The clock is ticking and Atlanta is about to catch fire…
Leave your comments
Preheat the oven to 350°F (180°C) and butter the bottom and sides of a baking dish or pan. Stuff the cannelloni shells with the cooled meat and carrot filling and line the filled shells up snugly in the buttered baking dish in a single layer. Pour the meat stock/tomato paste over and around the shells, sprinkle generously with the grated Parmesan, cover the dish with aluminum foil and bake for 35 to 40 minutes, removing the foil about 10 minutes before the end of cooking.
These are just some of the issues you’ll run into when living with a skinny person. You can love them, they can love you. Most likely you’ll enjoy workouts and physical activity together, but you’ll always eat more at the post-workout meal. This is all okay. You’ll get to where you want to be – in your own time, in your own way. As Anthony Robbins says (never mind that he had a tumor on his pituitary gland, which is why he’s so tall and lean…), as he says, “At any time you can turn the shoulds into musts. You can burn the boat.” By burning the boat, I think he means – give yourself no other options. Once I’ve burned my boat, I’ll have to get on the bike because they’ll be no other way back to shore. It will feel like driving a paddle boat, sure – a slow and dorky process seemingly going no where – but, eventually I will arrive.
I am not jealous. They were simply meant to be together. Amalia is finally being treated like a lady and I get to keep her in my life.
pushed into various areas of ecstatic joy and humble reverence.
We decided to work and play, which meant visiting some local microbreweries. I actually don't drink much beer, but I've been learning a lot about the brewing process since
There are over 300 recruitable characters, days progress very similar to that of Majora’s Mask where everyone lives out their daily lives and you can interrupt them as you see fit, you can KICK anyone you meet and fight them right there if you choose, changing armor actually changes your outfit, the weapon types really do matter and affect how your combos work, the graphics and music are absolutely beautiful, the story is pretty damn good and has an awesome fork, there are plenty of bonus characters and dungeons, it can actually get pretty damn challenging at times, the voice acting and writing in general is great and hilarious, and…well hell I could do this all day.
The Other Half (Atco LP 1968)
So what do you think? Is Parc de Bagatelle worth another afternoon? :)
A lot more work needs to be done to identify the best way for the legal system to satisfy these emotional needs of crime victims, and restorative justice theories may provide a good starting point for re-imagining the system. But the adversarial process as we know it probably can't accommodate those needs without taking every case to trial, which like it or not is a practical impossibility.
* David Gochfeld (the Maestro): in the group, he sings with what I consider to be a very pleasant crooning voice and plays the ukulele…and speaks with either a very funny foreign accent or speech impediment or a combination of the two. (Or maybe it’s just the beret that creates that illusion) He also acts outside the clown universe with many indie theatre companies, notably several productions with Stolen Chair. I got to act alongside him in Ian W. Hill’s Spacemen from Space, and he played mandolin in my recent performance of Jasper Jaxon. He’s also a terrific photographer, whose work has made it into just about every newspaper and magazine in New York (at least the ones that cover theatre; I don’t think he’s placed any pictures in Motor Trend).
Reef sharks, which are around six to eight feet long (1.8 meters to 2.4 meters), are the “apex predators” of coral reefs Baum says, and like predators in other eco-systems play an important role in structuring food webs. But there is still much to learn about their specific role.
And here's a nice video to get your spooky on!
Am I having a pre-midlife crisis or is this a full blown midlife crisis?
Then the plucky girl cut Jason’s mother’s head off. And then Jason popped out of the water. That did it. I couldn’t even scream. His skin was falling off. And he was still there. In the water. What was I going to do?
Bottom line for these bills passed, it will all do good to the public. These things exist to control the public’s behavior and way of life, to give sanctions to those who abuse, and to add improvements to the country. The act itself will lessen the number of germs that’s available on the streets but I think we are kind of immune to it. Like I am living here for 22 years and I’ve always come across places with spits, maybe if it’s enforced some will feel a small relief.
South Korea’s government says it is concerned about Pyongyang’s threat to reduce to ashes, in several minutes, the support base for the country’s president, including several broadcasters and a leading daily newspaper, the Dong-a Ilbo.
She is special
Now I just weld and then select both pieces and group. When you group them together you can move them together as one piece. Group is also on the tool bar to the left of flip.
Rewrites and Revisions: How much have you had to do throughout the writing of Magnus Fin and the Ocean Quest?
The Zoya site does not sell outside the US, so the only place to get my Zoya, is nailetc.com. I don't buy a lot of these because I find them pretty expensive, and I don't like the fact that they shrink with Seche Vite - my topcoat of choice.
Amid these challenges, craft beer and conflict management can benefit each other. Craft beer can offer conflict management an arena to showcase its services, garner experience, establish a track record, and enjoy craft beer. In return, conflict management provides efficient and affordable services that can strengthen craft breweries’ business models, manage potentially damaging disputes and strengthen the human ingredient. Craft breweries enter the business realm of contracts negotiations, such as leases and distribution rights, while some prepare to meet expansion measures. Craft breweries and brewpubs provide unique and time-honored venues where people gather to relax, discuss various topics, and mingle with fellow citizens—something conflict management loves to see.
Visit May 7-13, 2012 and automatically enter at a chance to win by commenting, GFC Follower, and/or become a Facebook Fan or Friend at each of the author blogs.
This was a story that illustrated precisely why Denene created MyBrownBaby nearly four years ago: As a place where the parents of children of color could explore the unique issues and emotions that course throughout their lives as they try to protect and enlighten and ferry their children safely to adulthood.
LENGTH…. : 58:55
I guess the strange thing about Starbucks pushing ‘the name thing’ is that they are a sprawling international business machine, and we’re used to that being totally at odds with interpersonal communication. When I worked in the City of London I knew of at least three Starbucks branches within a 5 minutes walk, and there’s something about someone knowing your first-name in that setting which just feels peculiar.
But three months????
3. Rinse the potatoes in water to get rid of the starch and place them in a colander to drain – leave them
Sometimes I just need to stop making minis for a while and enjoy a bit of crafting for myself. The Green Fairy has inspired these two accessories:
Yup. Raspberry and wheat. Has a zippy wheat smell that is just right though.
So the other day I was cruising through Facebook per usual and just trying to entertain myself so that I did not die from boredom. I noticed one of my friends (a fellow Asian actually) posted a song via Youtube so I decided to give it a listen. What I ended up listening to was not at all what I expected, but it was something I liked.
The manner in which they’ve covered this story is very skilful strategy by Rapport, as nowhere do they explicitly say that this may not be a typical farm murder. However, the scanty info they’ve published will, no doubt, place suspicion in the minds of many readers. It is also strange that Rapport avoided using the headline, “Nog ‘n Plaasmoord!” (Another Farm Murder), or something to that effect, which tells me they know far more than what they’re prepared to publish at this point in time.
Until the alien hordes descend upon our planet, however, it seems that the Brain has awaken and will yet again deliver more messages of cosmic terror, as this recent Facebook post states:
Nottingham Solidarity Network
Life weaves in and out for all of us just like seasons come and go in nature. The good news is I know GOD is in control of my life and I need not worry about a thing and I shall be content and live in the moment just like the animals do.
that these Reese's Krispies were awesome
Petra and Dmitry
Your creations were all gorgeous for last week's and look out for who was the winner
If you would like to suggest other survey vehicles that we may not be familiar with, please do so in the comments section. And yes readers, there might be a slight bias detected in the questions, since we are run by a group of civic-minded citizens pressing for action.
Fun huh?
the weather is so appalling here ... rain, gales and darkness
The future is also looking bright on the NCAA level with the prized Frosh Chris Derrick (Stanford), German Fernandez and Colby Lowe (Oklahoma State), Luke Puskedra (Oregon) all looking like potential All-Americans this year. We shall see. Terre Haute, IN is the place to be Nov 24Th.
I love you so much Aidan Christopher and words can not describe how much I miss you and wish you were still here with us.
Hoppy goodness! This dry hopped IPA exudes big citrusy aromatics followed by a well balanced blend of 3 different hops and malts that makes this beer simply luscious.
Until the completion of the Bay Bridge and Golden Gate Bridge in the 1930s, which began to carry railroad traffic, the Ferry Building was the second busiest transit terminal in the world, second only to London's Charing Cross Station. After the bridges opened, and the new Key System trains began running to the East Bay from the Transbay Terminal in 1939, passenger ferry use fell sharply. In the second half of the twentieth century, although the Ferry Building and its clock tower remained a part of the San Francisco skyline, the condition of the building interior declined with changes. Beginning in the 1950s, unsympathetic renovations installed a mezzanine level, broke up the grand space of the Great Nave, and partitioned the ticketing counters and waiting room areas into office space. The formerly grand public space was reduced to a narrow and dark corridor, through which travelers passed en route to the piers. Passengers were made to wait for ferries on outdoor benches, and the ticketing booths were moved to the pier.
See God in now
The following day we went for an adventurous drive through the Carnic Alps. They were majestic, I don’t know how else to describe them. I had traveled mountain roads before but nothing ever like this! The road snaked along the side of the mountains in a way that only bettered the view of the surrounding beauty. The snow lightly dusted the trees and there was no end in sight as we made our way deeper and higher into the Alps. I’m not gonna lie though, as beautiful as it was I was scared half to death most of the time. See, L is from Texas and he doesn’t “do” snow or ice for that matter. And he sure as heck didn’t know how to drive on it either. There were a few times I had to coach him through turns and inclines as he was obviously panicking while trying to control the tiny VW Golf he had rented. We began to make our way down the mountain and reached a tiny town called Barcis. A sign stating “two-way bridge” greeted us and I couldn’t believe my eyes…there is no way that bridge was a “two-way”. Maybe they meant there were two ways to die on it and one would be by trying to get across while another car did the same in the opposite direction. Case and point, the picture below.
They pulled me over again and the younger of the two said: “You will get lost sir,” and in no uncertain terms indicated I follow them again.
There is also this awesome place called Bio Bay with this crazy glowing water because of the flagellates in the water that glow. Apparently it is life changing and amazing…unfortunately there are no tours for EXACTLY the 7 days we are there because a full moon prevents the water from glowing. Just our luck…
I have already argued on this blog that the main reason more doctors don’t do late abortions is that they find it profoundly distasteful to be killing and then dismembering what is so obviously a baby.
It is critically important to understand the permeating motivations of Islamic extremism. For that reason, I wrote Blindsided: The Radical Islamic Conquest,which is being released on April 1.
Snow fences which prevent snow sweeping out of the expanseless tundra from burying our little village. They are as high as a house!
The tone, meanwhile, is a beautifully judged affair. Shushan Cats’ reference to the ‘seventeen fucking accents and dialects’ in Huckleberry Finn is no accident; SHOESHINE CATS is a symphony of accents and dialects that reflects the various immigrant groups’ origins, and reminds us of the extent to which New York was and is a melting pot. But Hesh Kestin isn’t satisfied with that: he strains a variety of accents and dialects through the filter of the classic hard-boiled novel, the dialogue whip-smart and crackling with Chandleresque humour.
This new reCAPTCHA system sticks a known word (known to the computer, that is) next to a piece of scanned text that the computer cannot read. When people enter the word verification and get the first word right, the computer gets to assume the second word was also entered correctly, and the system can now translate that word from that specific piece of writing. I am assuming, possibly incorrectly, that this same word must be translated multiple times in the same way before it is accepted as valid. One would hope, anyway.
Who are those people who as we walk through this life sharpen us or goad us along the way to live a Holy life unto God. We need to check out the company we are keeping, those who influence us most. If we are not keeping company with others,…we need to get into the company of people who will do us good and not harm – those who truly love the Lord in action, reaction, word and deed. Those whose lives and countenance radiate the fact that they keep company with the king – maybe like Moses they will be people (or maybe just regular people )who after having been in the presence of God won’t even be aware that they radiate His presence.
"Greenfingers, come up here and join us on stage!"
She would come, he knew she would.
Ok, I’ll stop trying to find redeeming qualities in what I essentially look to for fun. Though I do think it’s imperative to analyze what we find fun. Some way this dilutes the fun, but I think it usually increases it, mutates it, etc.
And rise above it
Wrap your passion around me, inside me
I have made this cake a few times, but always a smaller version using half the ingredients listed. This time I tried whole wheat pastry flour and loved it. I add slightly less sugar and don't make my own dulche de leche. I'm not fond of the idea of simmering an unopened can of sweetened condensed milk on my stove top for several hours. The ready made stuff is easy enough to find in Dallas. :)
My mother and the creative, well-intentioned toy companies have put me in a very uncomfortable situation. It is no longer safe for me in my own home or in the car or anywhere I go. My privacy, or whatever I had left of it since joining the ranks of motherhood, has been seriously eroded. Why? Because my mom bought my 5 year old daughter a camera. Suddenly everything in her environment deserves to be photographed without any consideration of propriety or society's boundaries. It all began innocently enough. My mom bought her a camera thinking that she would enjoy it and she does. My daughter LOVES her new toy. She is rarely separated from it and quickly notices it absence on the rare occasion when it is left behind. There are over 600 pictures and videos of random sights and events.
I find it hard to believe he kept a straight face while writing this:
16. Eighty-Four Hours
Mother: "What's wrong with you?"
Rossetti was first and foremost a painter – his poetic endeavours came a little later in life and almost didn’t materialise at all. In 1849 Rossetti was introduced to a young woman by the name of Elizabeth “Lizzie” Siddal, who posed for several painters including Walter Deverell and Hunt before modelling exclusively for Rossetti. The two fell in love but Rossetti’s growing acclaim and casual infidelities put a strain on the relationship and Lizzie’s health. In May 1860, Rossetti set off to visit her in Hastings and came to the belief that the two should marry. The couple’s connubial life was incredibly complicated, made more so by Lizzie’s deepening depression due to a stillbirth, insomnia, neuralgia and a growing dependence on laudanum. Lizzie died, on 11th February 1862, of an overdose. Compelled by contrition Rossetti buried his manuscript of poems with her and it later had to be retrieved at the suggestion of Rossetti’s agent Charles Agustus Howell. In his biography, Rossetti, His Life and Works, Evelyn Waugh writes about the exhumation, and Rossetti’s role in the process, saying: “He permitted and assisted in the preliminary formalities necessary for the recovery of the manuscript of his poems…This took place at night, under Howell’s supervision, and while it was being done Rossetti sat alone at the house of a friend in a fever of conflicting emotions. A fire was lighted by the grave and the coffin opened. It is said that the body was not unduly disfigured, but that some of the hair came away with the book.” The guilt plagued Rossetti for the rest of his life.
Tonight’s meeting begins at 6:30 p.m. in the legislative chambers.
“White Wash”
The wreckage revealed at the end of the episode could mean there was a plane crash and they all died then, hence making the whole island adventure some crazy ass purgatory where magic tricks and illusions run ramped and people can die over and over. Or the wreckage is staged for the next round of lost people to arrive on the "Island" lab to face their challenges.
Today I received a certificate showing that I have passed my first Latin exam. I really should now go on to level two but with a wedding coming up in three weeks and with serious sunbathing to do, I'm delaying it until the autumn. I know this is a stupid thing to do because if Latin is anything like the two-year German course I did, I'll have forgotten every single word, to say nothing of the nominative and accusative by the time I re-enrol.
On Sunday, a friend of ours called Megan, who does drama class with Alex had her joint birthday party with her twin brother. It was a lasergame party, which for those of you who don’t know, is similar to paintball, except you shoot with a laser gun so it doesn’t hurt. It was the first time either Alex or I had played, so we were really excited.
So let me take the most positive thing from the last (deleted) post:
I’m not going to bother discussing what I think she should do in this situation because it’s her decision and she took down the post so she could diplomatically begin discussions about keeping the story as it is. But what I did want to discuss is the role of gay characters in fiction and why I think it’s both important that they’re there and that we are able to see past their homosexuality. The thing that interests me about Collins’s problem is that if she dials back the romance the story will remain basically unchanged. Which means that it wasn’t solely about the two women being gay.
Ok , back to the Nerves. 6 short blasts of punky HC and the 7" is over before you know it.
Well, I loved watching Jeopardy! in high school. One time, during the teen tournament, there was a really cute guy competing. To this day, I remember his name. Matt Morris. He won.
It is no surprise to me that they were used as “Code Talkers” and without a written language the Japanese couldn’t desipher the meaning of their words. The power of their tongue preserved many lives and established them as sovereign nation working in concert with the rest of the United States. I visited Window Rock where the governing Navajos seek a clear vision for their people. Our government could learn something from a people that hold a conference where “like minded people gather together to enjoy and learn”. I thank the Navajo people for welcoming me, learning, and giving me more than I brought.
Almost three years ago I decided to start studying photography. I decided to turn a hobby into a career. I wanted something I could do for me, that would make me feel worthwhile again and something that didn’t require a lot of physical activity. Photography was something I could work around MY schedule and my body.
Through a doorway into the hall next door which is mostly storage space for various goods in transit. Some of it is for the brewery, empty and full kegs, pallets of bottles for the company’s contract-bottling customers, sacks of malt, boxes of fresh ginger for the ginger beer.
What was slightly weird was that there was a German film crew on hand making a documentary about the hotel. I don’t think they’d expected the dance weekend – the theme of which was WW2, it being the anniversary of the Battle of Britain and all that. So there were these wartime posters everywhere, whose message was hardly German-friendly. I don’t know what the film crew made of all this, or what they will say about it in their programme. 'Xenophobia alive and well in Britain', I shouldn’t wonder.
The Japanese have apparently gotten very serious about their coffee (Japanese always seem to get very serious about anything interesting), and their approaches to brewing coffee and the equipment designed for their techniques are finding their way to the US.
Did I mention how amazing the weather has been??
At its core "Sirens of Titan" is a concept novel with its primary mission being to force the reader in personal re-examination. Telling the story is second to the theme. Perhaps why both plot and characters are sacrificed as means for Vonnegut to get his point across. It's a strength and a weakness, when re-evaluating "Sirens of Titan" and its status as a classic.
* Share two (2) “teaser” sentences from somewhere on that page
Total Loss: 28.2 lbs
Omer Arbel - I am excited by the introduction of new technologies which enable us to manipulate materials in entirely new ways.
Now, for my project, I debated for WEEKS with myself about whether I should go with Thanksgiving or Halloween, and I settled on Halloween, because I LOVE Halloween gift projects. Doing these before Halloween is not my customary, procrastinat-y style, so I feel a lot more organized than I must have been feeling when I accidentally ordered a SECOND Mini Milk Carton Big Shot die!
I started with the Shiner Black (Schwarzbier, 4.9% ABV) as I knew I like that one fairly well. Not bad, not bad.
Locks Heath's quality was further highlighted when they scored a fourth from the edge of the box shortly after the restart. Four goals soon became five. This would be a result, that given the context of the game - missing players and quality of opposition - that most players will be able to shrug off. This couldn't be said for Martin Barnett. Not only is he based in Locks Heath, he is also one of their former players; so he would have been able to draw on these feelings to motivate himself for the match and score a goal I'm sad to have missed. Paul Dyke described it as Maradona-esque- an opinion endorsed by Ryan Hurst, who said Martin was full of nice touches in our midfield. I anticipate that we will have a larger squad for Wednesday's game with Hedge-End.
So without further ado, here's what our DT have come up with.
So this "recovery" is "normal", even though we know it isn't.
They are super easy: print, cut, glue and done. It takes simple supplies.
It was within the next hour that the noise started in the room next door. First it was the TV, then the voices. Lots of voices. I'd say there were at least 10 people in there - if not more. And that continued. Past 10:00. Past 11. On past midnight.
One, two, three ribbons at a time
I don't impose arbitrary limits on my children. I don't want them to learn arbitrary limits. I never want them to feel like there are only three markers to choose from.
When all the breathers of this world are dead,
RODRIGUEZ: When did this start? This obsession with having children?
2. I was trying hard to resist singing along since I know My Love was close enough to capture my vocal stylings or lack there of.
The Afrikaans Medium Decree of 1974 informed Circuit Inspectors and Principals of Black Schools that from January 1, 1975, Afrikaans had to be used for mathematics, and social studies from standard five (7th grade). This decree was only applicable to secondary (high school) students, and NOT primary schools. In fact, it was government policy that ‘Mother Tongue Education’ was compulsory for ALL RACES during the early formative primary school years. Only secondary schools were to use Afrikaans and English in a 50-50 mix as languages of instruction.
What stands out? The relationship between Pale Ale and IPA. The latter is indicated as being both stronger and more heavily hopped. You can probably recall me mentioning the odd 3,000 times that IPA was not a strong beer. But here it is clearly indicated as PA's big brother.
Have you ever thought of the logistics? How your little sister would have to haul each bucket of earth on the world's longest rope, and tip the bucket out before lowering it for the next shovelful?
Basically, he needs to marry Se Na so that history can repeat itself and someone will try to kill her. And from this he can figure out who tried to kill her doppelganger back home and return. I just love how he’s so confident that he’s cracked the mystery when there’s absolutely nothing to back up his theories. So what happens if he marries her and nothing happens? Regardless, since Bu Yong is most likely dead back home, Park Ha is the one whose life is in danger so how’s he going to figure that one out?
He crawled through the door and into his bedroom. When he reached his bed he tried one more time to stand up.
To start it has a very nice orange/amber color which coincides with the citrus flavor. For an IPA it has a rather light bitterness which makes this beer very enjoyable and easy to drink. It also has a pretty nice hoppy finish and if you look closely you can see all the hops on the label.
Hmmm....what can I say about change? It's hard--mega-hard. It's stressful, and most of the time, it's unavoidable. Change happens whether we like it or not. What I've learned in these past few months is that the only thing we can control is our reaction to change. We can either let go and embrace it or fight it. I've tried fighting it...it doesn't work. My little boy's favorite song is "Row, row, row your boat." Yesterday, as we sang the song together, I realized my answer has always been in this song. All along, I've been trying to row upstream--battling the current, using every ounce of my energy, and eventually being pushed back to where I started. Today, I'm going to row merrily down the stream. I might not know where I'm going, but I'll trust that the current knows the way...
I know it will be lovely - to be responsible for only my own self for four whole days. No one's butt to wipe on the potty, no one's dishes to load. No one's face to swipe clean and no one to shuttle back and forth. That I won't miss.
First Gold 40g – 7.8% @0mins (steep 20 mins)
Stay tuned for my next round of workshops, most likely upon my return in mid-April from a trip to Yellowknife to spread the Chi gospel there some more.
“This is an issue that just four to five months ago was not on the food industry’s radar,” said Paul Shapiro, the Humane Society’s vice president for farm animal protection. “Now it’s firmly cemented into the mainstream in a way that I think few people would have imagined.”
by RSR
Knight and Burgher, Lord and Dame,
Sprinkle salt, pepper and paprika on top of the uncooked turkey breast
O such for me! O an intense life, full to repletion and varied!
Bludgeoned by the Godhead
In the fourth millennium and in the first half of the third, the Mehrgarh potters and those from other parts of Balochistan alike became known for producing very high quality ceramics which were either exported or copied in eastern Iran, southern Afghanistan, and even as far as present-day Tadjikistan, notably at the Sarazm site. These periods are also distinguished by the manufacture of human figurines of a high aesthetic quality, whose attributes seem to suggest references to an underlying mythology still unclear to us.
Hey gang, sorry about last week. Was a rough one. This weekend, I was flipping through the channels and found one of my favorite “movie that everyone else hates” playing. So let’s take a look at the 2007 movie Next starring Nicholas Cage.
I saw we were passing by a front desk. I’d never been in the building, but I had passed by it a few times. It was surprisingly empty. There weren’t many PRT uniforms around, either.
In this story there is a crow that is fed on leftovers by Vaisya children and praised by them to the point of a swollen head. One day it meets a swan of the manasa sarovara and arrogantly claims superiority to it. In a contest it displays more than a hundred styles of flight while the swan using one single style leads it to a crocodile infested ocean. Here the crow has no place to rest and begins to drop into the ocean, tired. It realises its limitations and apologises to the swan and seeks its help. The swan takes it on its back and brings it home. Salya makes it clear to Karna, that for all his styles of fighting, he was like the crow fed on the left-overs of the Kauravas and he had lost to Arjuna on three occasions, at Virata, after Draupadi‘s swayamvara, and in the incident of the battle against Chitrasena, the Gandharva, where the Pandava Arjuna who had to free Duryodhana.
Hello Delightful friends and family!
1.2%: Fraction of women in the general population who report their husbands or boyfriends are “extremely violent”.
Waylaid him in a Darkened Street.
Fredericton’s Second Cup is loud and busy on a Tuesday afternoon and Conor doesn’t like it.
Brand: Brand is a subjective thing, it's surely better to choose a renowned brand with experience in this field than anunknown brand.
· Kaskade, artist
16. Actor Charlton Heston “parted” the Red Sea attraction on the Universal Studios Tour at the attraction’s grand opening in 1973.
Varices de grosseur ?
But since then I have been reminded of that gaping hole in my gut again. And feeling that hole so much again makes me wonder if it will ever stop hurting. Will I ever be whole again? Will I ever be the same carefree, innocent person without a care in the world ever again? I don't know that I will be or even can be. And part of me is glad because that means I will always remember you, but the other part of me wishes so much that I could just be normal again. Normal like I was before your daddy and I ever started trying to have kiddos. Normal and carefree and completely oblivious to the stupid, horrible and totally unfair things that happen in this world. I don't understand it, Carter. But I guess there is no sense in fighting it. I can't change my circumstances, I can only embrace who and where I am currently. It's hard though, buddy. It's hard to stay positive sometimes.
How to decorate? That's the fun and the trick. Like the coat hanger/stocking sculptures these can go downhill during the painting process. When casting the hand remind the students repeatedly to smooth the plasters to they have a smooth surface to paint on later. Make sure students have a drawn out plan before they start to paint. I've started to require a simple symbol or image be incorporated into the design. It would be great to take one of the patterns from the common threads background and paint the hand that way. Animal prints work well sometimes...if done well. Some students have painted mendi like designs that take time and and a paint pen but look nice.
The greatest genius of Smallville is taking something gamers always do – in this case, constantly get into pissing contests with each other over the smallest things and fail to move the plot forward as a result – and make it both in-setting appropriate and wired into the system.
Proposed changes are expected to be enacted before the Court’s term ends in April, though insiders admit that could be delayed pending the outcome of negotiations for a syndication deal with Fox TV for fall sweeps.
Forex is a market that allows you to deal with the exchange of foreign currency throughout the world. With a measure of discipline and planning, Forex trading can be a lucrative venture that is managed on your own time frame, from anywhere in the world.
Makes me break out...oh wait- that isn't how the song goes...lol But since I am allergic to the sun, it is how it goes for me...
On Mink’s turn, we’re really not sure what to do because two potential humans/potential cylons are now in the brig, and no one knows if that should change or stay the same. Frank convinces Mink to Executive Order Frank to use his once-per-game — and to check all of my Loyalty Cards, knowing that if he can confirm that I’m human, then he can confirm that Brent is human as well since I vouched for him earlier.
Conseco Fieldhouse
Life around here has started to pick up and be busy again, slowly but surely. Jadyn continues to do gymnastics on Monday nights (and loves every minute of it!), and starting mid-September, she will be playing on a soccer league for 3-4 year olds! I'm so excited to be a 'soccer mom', and I hope she has fun playing! It will DEFINITELY be a learning experience for her (and her parents)! Anyone who wants to come see her play (or atleast look cute in her little soccer uniform), email me and I will send you her schedule when it comes out.
During the offseason, Hedberg was traded to the Vancouver Canucks, where he backed up Dan Cloutier. He would play just 14 games with Leksands, now down in the second division during the 2004-05 season when the NHL season was cancelled before returning to the NHL with Dallas the following season where he backed up Marty Turco.
Danforth Marina was silent as well, boats bobbed up and down gently with the waves, anchored to their moors. The fishing docks, where a good chunk of Emerson’s revenue generated was also empty. Stands that sold fresh caught fish were vacant, rotted fish sat in the open where the ice had long since melted. The sound of buzzing flies could be heard in nearly every corner of the city, from downtown to suburbia to the waterfront. The incessant droning was only outdone by the stench of rot and decay that also came to permeate Emerson.
c'est interessant, mon petit frere..
What a story! This is someone, who despite all this, has held a full-time job, and also finds time to encourage others…particularly me. She is always sending me tips and recipes. And taking the time to see how I am doing.
Our lab, Holly, loves blankets. Like a toddler, she carries her blanket around the house. She shakes it, tosses it in the air, wraps herself up in it, and occasionally chews on it. She loves to play tug of war with her blanket. If we are not in the living room (where her bed is), she will grab her blanket and follow us throwing it down to use it as a temporary bed.
Most of the eclectic art we make comes from recycled materials, simple pop art designs and lots of glue, nails, paint, screws…anything that we might come across.
What I do say is that a person cannot be both Jew and White at the same time. It appears to me that where the interests of Whites and Jews diverge Auster prefers Jewish interests. That’s fine. Being an ostensibly White opinion shaper I’d just like him to be more clear on this point. From his swift and negative dismissal of my comments so far it seems in a way that he has.
AFP, TASS via VOR
Combine ground turkey and all spices. Add in grated apple and carrot. Stir in 2 Tbs bread crumbs. Form into one inch meatballs and then coat with additional bread crumbs. Place on a lightly greased cookie sheet. Bake at 350 for 30-35 minutes. Let cool for 2 minutes. Serve.
Hi guys! I'm here today with the lovely Diane Messidoro on the last stop of her blog tour for How to Keep a Boy as a Pet. If you haven't had a chance to pick up a copy yet just head over to Goodreads and check out the reviews - I'm sure any contemporary fans will adore this one.
It is a fact that female vanity is innate in all women but, if millions of other women who cannot afford beauty products can survive without them for most (if not all) of their lives, why would I be any different? As such, this project was more than just a I’m-so-kickass-‘cause-I-don’t-need-no-conditioner project. It was a way of impressing onto one’s brain that, despite the blessings one has been receiving from family and other benefactors that has led to a relatively easier way of living, at the end of the day, all women – all people – are the same. It just so happens that, for other women, Lady Luck has been very kind in this lifetime. Being grateful instead of being ignorant or indifferent about it is the point.
Main Ballroom
Point of view (POV) is defined as the person who is telling the story and from where s/he will tell the story. Ideally, it should be one person – two at the most – protagonist (hero or heroine) and antagonist (villain). Occasionally, a second hero’s or heroine’s point of view is also used, especially in romance novels. If you do decide to use two or three people, it is imperative that you keep their POV’s separate. This is done by having each POV confined to either a chapter or scene or, at the very least, a lengthy paragraph. The point of view should not skip from sentence to sentence. That’s called head hopping and, like watching a never-ending tennis match, becomes tedious and gives you a headache.
The Heavenly Treasures/HT Handicrafts giveaway will end on Monday Nov. 28, 2011 at 11:59 pm CST. Winner will be chosen using random.org.
that race forward from the shadows
Trying to get that Oktoberfest out of my mouth, I crack on a bone-chilling cold Hofbrau Maibock. DAMN I LOVE MAIBOCK. Right now, my four favorite things are in this order: my lovely daughter, maibock, the movie Snatch, and James David Manning youtube videos. Maybe it's just that nobody fricken makes Maibocks these days, it's all Traditional bocks, or dunkel lagers or vienna lagers masqeurading as bocks, any of course the same 4 doppelbocks.
I occasionally have full-length feature movies as dreams. Complete with scene changes, flashbacks, the whole nine yards. I've had Harry Potter dreams, dreams about some of the other books I read, murder-mystery dreams, but this dream takes the cake so I had to write it down.
It’s a bit of a shame that I’m without my sketchbooks over the past four years, but when I’m finally reunited with them I’ll have to post a few extracts up on this forum. In the art foundation years, I had gotten seriously indulged in the art of the eye.
There was Phil Collins with “Sususido”, The Bangles with “Walk Like an Egyptian”, Huey Lewis and the News with “The Power of Love”, Pat Benatar with “Love is a Battlefield”, and (my personal favorite, and wtih a great video to boot…and now you know way too much about me) a-ha with “Take On Me“.
Were the instructions easy to follow? The instructions were super easy.
My heart is shattered; I am barely making it here,
Russia and Serbia look at Austria.
“It is a conscious business call by companies and is a good strategy given the economic conditions in India. The market is not as rosy, given high inflation and liquidity crunch. Companies would want to get consumers to try products and move them to higher price points,” Sanjay Coutinho, CEO of Om Pizzas & Eats, says.
Try it yourself ... and do the calculations for others in your family and just see how uncanny the results are!
It is true, however that Fayette County Georgia has a wealthier income profile than does its neighboring Clayton County to the north. Fayette is rapidly diversifying as the famed "Black Flight Progressives" move into town, mostly to consume the quality schools and to obtain stability in home values.
Hi again everyone! I have another card to share. I will be making four of these, for the four families of grandkids in their first week of school. I really had fun with this card, heck, I have fun with every card!
Whatever it is, let's just hope it's really big and dumb so the rest of us can continue to stay "refreshed."
For all of that, I am paying the price today. I might be riding my bicycle and logged almost 4 hours on it since the last time I accidentally reset the computer gadget, but my quads are aching today. The outside of my ankles, throb at times from keeping my heels down. Although I didn't think I used a lot of leg on her- my inner thighs beg to differ. My lower back- yeah we won't go there and before I even got on her, my shoulders cramped up in a way they have never done before. This is not what riding is about! WTH? I guess I need to get my butt in the saddle more often... :) Maybe then I can wipe the grin off my face or it will become more permanent with each ride. Time will tell.
Hi, I'm Natalie. "Natty Michelle" began as a way to keep track of my favorite things and snippets of inspiration for weddings, home decor and fashion. It has since expanded to posts featuring do-it-yourself projects, paper goods, vintage finds and my day-to-day happenings. Thank you so much for visiting!
Browning's Brewery Louis XVI Guillotine ESB Ale
We aren’t upset to be out the $12. We can replace the pumpkins, despite their perfection. But when I saw our bare front step, I was ready to rip someone’s head off, rampage in my wounded mama-bear armour, and find the punks that took them to give them what for. Not because I wanted the pumpkins, but because they were for my son. I was angry for my son. I’ve never felt that way before. I don’t think it would have mattered what it was that was gone, just the fact that they were taken from him.
Jingle All the Way ... FMC ... 10 PM
Researchers examined the acidity levels in 13 sports drinks and nine energy drinks. They found that the acidity levels can vary between brands of beverages and flavors of the same brand.
So after this lovely evening this argument continued over the internet. Some friends of mine were upset because I called a girl a twat and a poser because she was being a poser twat. However my friends did not feel this way and got mad at me and continued this argument that had been going on for days! Eventually I was able to get everyone to chill out after the unteenth try at changing the subject. One of my friends was being really sweet though, she just stepped in and started telling everyone to get off my back. It was really sweet and much appreciated!
Now it's Tavares.
Here, the marks NETGATE and NETGARD "were adopted to indicate that the products offer network access and network protection, respectively." Purchasers would recognize this indication or suggestion.
This one we obtained from the drinks/ dessert stall at the Food Junction (a food court) at the bottom of the Great World City shopping mall. (I did tell you in the last post that Singapore has many, many, many shopping malls). The other desserts at this stall can be a bit hit and miss, but the soursop jelly really scores.
The petition drive was canceled in the face of the overwhelming police presence.
6) T-shirt repurposed bags. I have a boat-load of t-shirts that I don't really wear much, or just wear them to bed. I would LOVE to turn them into reusable bags or other fun stuff. Check this person's awesome t-shirt bags here: http://www.moredesignplease.com/moredesignplease/2010/6/6/diy-recycled-t-shirt-tote-bag.html
The best monster would be a Shadow Warg. It just sounds so cool, and it's really powerful. It brings a cool image to my mind. It reminds me of a character in a graphic novel I read - mysterious and dark.
When he came to his senses, he said, ‘How many of my father’s hired men have food to spare, and here I am starving to death! I will set out and go back to my father and say to him: Father, I have sinned against heaven and against you. I am no longer worthy to be called your son; make me like one of your hired men.’ So he got up and went to his father.
With Zoellick leaving, the search is also now on for World Bank leadership of the caliber of Dominique Strauss-Kahn – the former IMF managing director sunk in a New York civil lawsuit for rape and a Lille prostitution-ring investigation – and Paul Wolfowitz, the former World Bank president fired in 2007 for nepotism, though not for being architect of Washington’s oil-fueled 2003 invasion of Iraq.
Happy May Day everyone! To start off the month, we have brand new sketch for you. This sketch was created by our design team member Nadia Cannizzo.
This is one of my favorite shots! I climbed up the bench where Haley was sitting and took this shot from above. Notice her hair flying around a bit, I thought that made the image more fun!
Conditions can make you smile
Death, however, could not hold Florian. He returned in a vision, telling a young woman to go to the Dagobah system, and that he didn't like having his body left on the bottom of a river. He was eventually dredged up and buried near his childhood home, which is now called Sankt Florian. Sorry, I don't know what it was originally called, but we'll just say it was "Tatooine".
The width of your lens opening is indicated by the F (or f) number. The LOWER the F number, the LARGER the lens opening. I know that it doesn’t make sense, but it is important that you remember it.
Seat #6 is the button
The main problem though is that the most affordable model is very, very expensive compared to say a netbook and the money for it is coming out of our pockets, not the House of Commons or the MP's.
1) Fry the chillies,onion,tomato and garlic.
- it is ok to touch a person struck by lightning, there is no electrical charge left
What Skrebowski offers is a sound rejoinder to those economists who say that peak oil theorists don't take into account economic factors--factors which those economists say will solve the problem of peak oil whenever it arrives by destroying demand and making substitutes profitable. For now, however, we can see that the economic factors are not really solving the problem of peak oil, but possibly feeding it. That's not something most economists will be able to hear. And, it describes a pattern that will likely only confuse the public and policymakers even though Skrebowski has explained it in terms that any thoughtful person can understand--if only they want to.
Ok, I am lying. It is cold and rainy today, and it's still January.
Malva pudding is a typically South African dairy dessert, available in just about every local restaurant. It’s a sticky, sweet and very delicious cake/dessert. My guests are always guessing when I put it on the table. It’s appearance is underwhelming at best, and really looks like something you aren’t sure you want to eat, so they are usually quite suspicious at first sight. Once they taste it, all concern flies out the window and they can’t stop eating it. The ingredients are simple, the taste is all in the method and the sauce is what makes all the difference. One of the many advantages of this dessert is that you never have to wonder how to store the leftovers.
Today was rainy, cloudy and a bit chilly, which ended up being a perfect day for the first day of school. Although, since it was so cloudy these pictures turned out kinda blah and grainy. I think Sister needs to come over and work some first day of school picture magic. How bout it? :)
Out I went in my comfy cozy Rudolph jammies to plug it in!
To play the slop machine!
Our initial assessment was that both parties had been consuming alcohol, that the female was acting in the best interest of the EDP male. So there was no domestic assault, that the female appeared to be alert, oriented and properly interacting with us during the interview. On the other hand the male needed immediate psychological intervention.
The stars in the bright sky
Chuffed - pleased
“I like the flowers. I wish they would be in bloom for longer. They add such color to the world. And then, they’re gone.” That’s all I could think of to say. As we sat there on that bench, looking at the snapdragons, I finally asked her, “Why do people lie?”
And as I am likely to do, I walked right into the middle of a big ol' something.
"Why should we care when someone dies, because we are not at work while the government doesn't care about our lives," said one nurse, who refused to give her name.
-Beijing University of Sciences and Technology
The fundamental principle underlying the right to a fair trial is that every individual is presumed to be innocent until proven guilty. Hence no one individual should be treated like a criminal until a court of law has passed a decision declaring them so. Even if the circumstantial evidence points to the guilt of the individual, they must still be given the opportunity to go through all the motions of a trial to present their case, present mitigating circumstances – if they are there – and receive a sentence that is proportionate to the gravity of their crime. Amongst the motions of a fair trial should be the ability of an accused to be granted bail. This is dependent on the state giving sufficient evidence to prove that the accused is not a fit and proper person to grant bail. Of course, there is need to balance the interests of justice in granting bail: for instance, whether the accused will interfere with witnesses, tamper with evidence, or attempt to flee (among such other issues) must be taken into account.
Here is the second card, just different flowers and background paper:
which implies,
I was always curious about this, and now I know…
As always thanks for stopping bye.
It's all about facing your fears. I refuse to be held back and not doing things that I was once made fun of because I was "fat. With the 10 year anniversary of having the gastric bypass rapidly approaching and being 14 pounds away from the goal weight I sat when I had it. I've gotten this "refreshed" view on obtaining that goal.
1. The Artistic Ingredient: If your artwork could talk, what would it say?
The Americans acted in their own interests and not in the interests of Vietnam. The killing of Diem caused tremendous turmoil for the people of South Vietnam. If Diem had lived, the course of the Vietnam War may have gone in a much different direction.
A day before we met, I made her a card... to express my excitement for finally able to meet her in person :)
“We are going to be here for a little while,” the girl says to (I presume) her father. “We might just stay here forever. We are going to visit the little park.”
At then end of the day it is......like everything else about LOVE.
Alright, I'm itching to get out there, so I need to wrap this up. I made a new pizza (shock) the other night for a mother's day dinner for my mom that I rather enjoyed. So here it is. :)
I would have to say I have held onto several strange items!
Another model for looking at roles is to look at types such as the hero, mascot, scapegoat, lost child and black sheep. Psychotherapist Kjersten Halvorsen explains, “Do you find yourself assuming the position of child when you engage with a parent or sibling?…Adult children the world over face this, often crippling, sensation when engaging with those in their family of origin.” The Hero is usually the firstborn (though not always) and will step in and try to make things “right,” and the Black Sheep will try to help. The scapegoat is the child who is perpetually “guilty” and does not fit in with the family. The lost child feels different inside and tries to be invisible. The mascot is the popular but impulsive child who the family strives to protect. John Harvey explained, “Over time we play a lot of roles. There is nothing wrong with any of these roles. No judgement.”
Red featured also featured in this show…
Mr de Charette was even more gentle of spirit.
The basement itself is one of the most remarkable features of the house. The whole building will be heated by a large Smead furnace. The arrangements for hot and cold air, the big filtering apparatus, the scientific pluming, sewerage, and ventilating system strike one forcibly in contemplating the improved methods in modern architecture. Mr. Nagle himself supervised the whole work, and to his keen judgment the complete success of many unique features is entirely due. The building, exclusive of the grounds and stables, cost about $35,000.
But God is standing near. He sees your falling tears
But what is Orval? Is it the green, lively beer they first bottle, sticky with hop resins? Or is it the older beer, pulled from cellar shelves after a year or two of aging? This ale is austere--bone dry and tart, a meditative beer for a quiet evening.
2. Your boyfriend specifically told you he hates them and only used him for money and all he wanted to do was give them their stuff back.
-- The TPC (for The The Players Championship not the course)
Should I buy it? If it can tell me how many times a woman of a certain age can do the Double Pinwheel before she has to stop to take an extra hit of blood pressure medication, then yes.
8. Get a dermal anchor piercing: Decided to wait until after the wedding.
Leaning on the rail, I was collecting my thoughts while I waited to go to work. The crews had arrived and were inside the living quarters cleaning up before supper. I could hear the faint roar of the engines on the work boats as they tied up to the satellite structures to the east. They would be there until morning, unless called, or something happened.
There's Henry Drucker. He has a chair
Upon arriving on the scene, the correctional staff went into action immediately. Staff saw one of the passengers, a 16-year-old male, trapped underneath the vehicle after apparently being ejected while the vehicle was rolling. The other three passengers were seat belted in their seats and remained inside the vehicle.
"There are just too many people writing."
I’d never seen the class do that before.
We get escorted back the the exam room and a nice lady rolls in a box of implants. Great, a boob box. She has a stretchy, one-size-fits-all sports bra for me to wear. Farrah and I began squeezing the various sizes of implants like we were at a fruit stand, but I have the pleasure of trying them on with the fashionable bra. Great. Here is our box of boobs and pick out a pair. I feel extremely uncomfortable with the whole deal. Its like I was 12 stuffing my bra with socks.
At home, we have fun telling jokes about Peter the Great and King Canute, and staying up late to finish the last chapter of Tom Sawyer, and rolling down mountainsides while most children are doing maths in sweltering classrooms.
Great Enchanting Quotes for Her
The designer finished work on it this week, and as soon as I can put in all the new content (kind of a massive job, but I'm on it), we'll unveil it--with luck, December 1st!
After our flight in we pretty much went straight to Gott's for Ahi tuna burgers, sweet potato fries and pumpkin shakes (what bridesmaids dress??)
How are you affected by holding in your desires?
Obuolio skiltelé (Garnish with Apple Slices)
Sensationalism in the tabloid press is not uncommon and it appears that provocative headlines and large pictures have been a part of the press for over one hundred years. However, there is a change between the reputation of these publications. Hearst’s publications seemed to providing a new frontier in popular culture, integrating personal interest stories with opinion and sensationalism, whereas tabloid publications of today are accused of “dumbing down” news and focusing on scare mongering and moral panic. While I would agree that the articles and headlines of the tabloid publications are still printed to appeal to a particular readership, there is definitely a change in the way these publications are received.
The number of British military deaths in Afghanistan since 2001 now stands at 404.
For anyone planning a trip to the Las Vegas area, Las Vegas locals, or anyone in Southern California that makes a regular pilgrimage to Sin City, be sure to carve out some time for an action packed and affordable night of entertainment. The production value, match making and overall feel of the shows these three promoters produce put many regional professional MMA shows to shame.
I’d recommend this book to anybody who loves a bit of old-school horror, and fingers crossed we’ll be seeing a Sam Raimi style screen adaptation before too long.
Before I say anything else, I want to thank Jesus for bringing me the most amazing man I’ve ever met.
He said the Cabinet also ordered the Home Ministry and the police to complete the investigations into the Teoh’s death as soon as possible and he was told that it would be ready within the next few days.
My heart not folded up with my clothes.
Anyway, rant over and here's my Page 6 finish......
“Mary Lethert Wingerd’s “North Country: The Making of Minnesota” is a history of the Indian experience in Minnesota, from the first encounters with Europeans to the removal of tribes in the aftermath of the Sioux Uprising. This era is unfurled with exacting detail and personal attention to the feelings and actions of the principal characters. It is a well-done and fascinating tale.
Miller (a man thirty years her senior) in 1934 and moved to Claremont, California. An active member of her local church, producer Fred Bock - who made a career out of religious music - heard Elva’s EP and convinced her to try more modern songs which he then took to different record labels in the hope of securing her a deal. Disc jockey Gary Owens (who wrote the sleeve notes for Mrs Miller’s Greatest Hits and went on to become the announcer on Laugh-In) was friendly with Bock and featured Elva on his radio program as early as 1960 and included her on his first comedy album, Song-Festoons, in 1962. Owens claim to have created the character of Mrs Miller is stretching it a bit, but he can certainly be credited with having brought her to the attention of Capitol Records and producer Lex de Azevado – who long-time WWR followers will know as the producer of Ric King’s dreadful Return of a Soldier.
It's OK though. Here's what you do in the meantime:
Though I’ve given away a lot of the book, there really is more to it and Olson does a good job of guiding the reader on the path to success. Though it doesn’t seem to be in wide release most places (I had to inter library loan my copy) I highly recommend getting your hands on a copy and reading it.
My one pet peeve of the place (not that anyone’s listening) – is that the place didn’t become a car-free zone. Considering it’s historical significance, a more timeless place could have been created if traffic had been banned. But don’t let my criticism stop you from visiting. Please come meet a Winnipegger at The Forks, down where the rivers converge – like it’s been done for hundreds, if not thousands, of years.
“It has definitely created a bad image for Bersih and they should take full responsibility. The rally was an irresponsible act and its leaders must take responsibility,” Balakrishnan said.
When I was little, from about 6 to 8 years old, I spent a lot of time locked in my bedroom. Most of those years are wiped from my consciousness and always have been, It is only thru meditation that I extracted some understanding of those years. I was not only locked in my bedroom, but my mother, stepfather and siblings would go out for a family day and I was left alone. But, it seems that was needed too, because I would be visited by Jesus, his mama Mary and the one piece of my own puzzle that always left me baffled… Franklyn. What the heck was he doing in my childhood??
7. “Lilac Wine” featuring Imelda May
Meanwhile, Peter who was later admitted into the Lagos State Polytechnic met one Mary and they both started dating. Unknown to him, the lovebird latter turned out to be his stepsister (being the girl his mother had for the Yoruba man his mother remarried in Lagos) after putting her in the family way.
If I could sum up Korean service to you, I would have to emphasize the attention to detail and respect for the customer. Show interest in a certain product? You get free samples of similar ones. Need something gift wrapped for free? A professional couldn’t do a better job. Look even a bit lost and confused? Someone will be there for you in a matter of moments. And you can always expect a friendly hello and goodbye every time.
The families of police officers steel themselves for the worst. In an unrelated incident that same weekend, a domestic dispute led to a scuffle and a shove sent New York City Police Officer Alain Schaberger, of Brooklyn's 84th Precinct, nine feet down a flight of steps where he broke his neck and died. It was an accident, say relatives of the suspect who pushed Schaberger.
This fully functional app is $8.99 and I think it’s well worth it. MacStitch and WinStitch 2012 are sold separately, start at $40 for the basic program, and are offered in the form of download, CD, or USB stick. Right now I’m playing with the demo version of WinStitch 2012, and look forward to purchasing the premium version ($65 download) soon.
One great surprise was a GORGEOUS antique shop converted from an old bank building, I think in Stratford. Though I didn’t find any steals for the shop, it was still a truly enjoyable and inspiring vintage shopping experience. Here are some pics:
The snow melting, I hate how it leaves white marks on my brown leather boots.
This has really helped me. Initially, I wasn’t doing anything special with the verses or the contents of something I read. Gradually, I knew there was a back story to each verse. It has led me from just reading the verse, to reading the passage it was in. From there it has led to reading the whole chapter it was in. Finally, it led to reading the whole book.
She doesn't follow my blog so I'm safe to post this. Her family is celebrating her 10th Transplant Anniversary on sunday the 15th and it is also her Birthday!!! So guess who we'll be surprising on the 15th!!! Oh I can't wait! So I'm putting together a basket of all kinds of things,note books,candle,candies,cup and those butterflies i made a while back. I need a few more things to put in there but when I'm all done,I'll take a pic to show you.
Thirty years ago under a Thatcher Government who would have thought that even the Tory Party would be a Marxist left wing shadow of its former self, or predicted the dire state of the country would be in now. How did the Marxists do it? Well the British people have become fat and lazy. Not just physically but morally, the Marxists knew this and led us one small step at a time never revealing the ultimate destination till it was too late. We need to do the same, the people will never elect the Government that most Nationalists crave with a passion. Small steps at a time, that is why Geert Wilders has come from starting his own party (PVV) in 2004 to being the third largest in terms of MP seats in just six short years. How far have the BNP come in that time? This is why we need change not just in leadership but policy. The road to success is in small steps Brothers and a charismatic leader with vision. This is why I advocate change, when the ship is heading for the abyss then a change in any direction is better than doing nothing.
A quite imperfect world
Jesus has finished his work. He stayed faithful, loving, and true until the very end. He stood, didn’t flinch and He has made a way for everyone to encounter, approach, and have a relationship with God. He fulfilled the will of the one who sent him for the sake of all and to the glory of his Abba. Jesus finished strong and displayed the love of God for everyone. God loves us not because we have earned that love, but because God is love and envelops all of creation in a boundless and perfect love beyond worthiness and unworthiness, beyond fidelity, and infidelity.
So what's all the fuss about 'LoveTel Motel' by Magic Ship? Well, let me give you my personal take on the songs.
The answer, in complicated language, is essentially NO, but here is how they word it:
In a letter dated September 14, 1940, Mrs. May E. Campbell (state director of the WPA’s Professional and Service Projects) and Colbert F. Crutchfield (state supervisor of the Historical Records Survey) jointly described the cemetery survey work: “these records were compiled as a sort of side line to their work of surveying church records. They were requested to fill in their time between appointments with church officials by listing near-by cemeteries…. The worker prepares a cemetery form, containing pertinent data about the location and condition of the cemetery and a list containing an entry for each stone, giving only the factual information thereon. This material is forwarded to the Raleigh office of the Survey, where a card for each cemetery and for each stone is typed. The cemetery cards are filed in alphabetical order within each county in separate files. The tombstone cards are filed in straight alphabetical order by surname for the state as a whole. Each tombstone card, of course, carries the name of the cemetery and the county. The cemetery itself can be located by reference to the former file.” The writers further state that the work “is not by any means complete, as we consider it a by-product of the church records work and do not attempt to cover all cemeteries or any particular locality. We have to-date filed approximately 5,023 cemetery cards and 177,044 tombstone cards.”
It was a great day to drive to Portland, Oregon and find a place of solitude, peace and prayer.
as I spent most of my teenage years dressing like it was halloween everyday I like to be a bit more colourful these days........(I'm thinking Mars Attacks girl alien)
Beat in the peanut butter.
I remember that my grandfather had a contraption that he'd made himself. It consisted of a plywood base to which had been attached a long metal rod which bent slightly at the end. The end of the rod had a screw thread and attached to this was a small vice like attachment which was used to hold the hook.
And tell you what my star told me
Spring onions
Have you heard of Common Cents? It’s a non-profit organization based in my burg, New York City, that encourages school children to “harvest” the pennies in their neighborhoods—that is, the pennies most of us have sitting in a jar that just keeps getting heavier and heavier. Cool idea, right?
o_O" That strikes absolute terror into my heart. More than seeing my Ex again.
Roman men and women wore tunics, like a big tee-shirt. Probably no underpants. So you could just hike up your tunic and sit down. The tunic would modestly cover your knees at the front so nobody could SEE anything. (They might have been able to HEAR and SMELL some things, however...)
1895-1896: “importers and wholesale grocers, cotton factors and commission merchants.”
Jamar Rogers (Team Cee Lo) – singing “Its My Life” by Bon Jovi. I really hope Jamar wins because I would love to hear a Cee Lo and Jamar collaboration. I really liked Jamar’s performance. He has a great rasp in his tone. I like the 80’s vibe with his clothes and the graffiti. “Its my life, its now or never.” Great words. Carson Daly obviously enjoyed his performance giving Jamar a big hug afterwards. Adam said Jamar was the first voice they heard during the blinds, and of course he said he would love to have Jamar on his team. Blake said he doesn’t know if there has ever been a better pairing of a song with a contestant. Xtina said she loved that he made it his own and he sang it like his life was on the line. Xtina said he is one of the favorites in the competition and besides for those on her team she is rooting for him. Cee Lo said he is a strong and sweet spirit and said he loved him. He is definitely an inspirtation, Again. I hope he wins. Hands down. I know there are other people that are great who are still in the competition but I love this dude. 1-855-VOICE-01
There's an idea that when a person sees or hears an owl, it is prophetic of impending death.
The woman glared at me, I just smiled and walked away.
and a few more... i have a bunch more to make and will be sharing that soon... gonna take a blogging break (from posting) for the weekend but i couldn't leave you stranded on this friday and was glad i had something done to share with you... so i'm hoping these will spark some mojo in you to get crafty over the weekend!
Ten years after, and no serious questions are asked anymore. We’re encouraged instead to remember, honor, mourn, commemorate, etc., while singing so loudly during the seventh inning stretch as to drown out any voices of doubt inside our heads. We are then shown the deluded 9/11 Truthers as a moral lesson.
(Also, i apologize for any of the typos and grammatical errors in today's post - B-rad is Weekly Challenge Editor in Chief, and he's so adorably sleeping on the couch and i can't bare to wake him.)
...just plain bonkers?
the stuffed deer at the entrance to Grandma's
Through elementary school and over several moves, I've always had both Asian and non friends, and where we were, it never seemed to be an issue. I lived in NYC then, and everyone was pretty much from somewhere else, so no one batted an eye if some of my Indian friends broke out into Hindi or some of my Jewish friends had to go home early for Shabbat dinner or if I had dumplings or noodles packed for my lunch.
Progress in Career
They get to open up about what they hated about it, and how they swore they’d find a way to never have to do that again.
The whole time I am doing it---trying to do it---my mind keeps telling me that I am doing it all wrong. I am not sitting right. I am not laying down right. I am not thinking right. I am not quieting my mind right.
Enjoy a couple of my latest prediction videos for two upcoming world title fights…
But seriously, my older son had no problem gobbling down a few! He said, Hey Mom, I love those pie cookies! Guess he thought they were like whoopie pies!
I have in my heart how you allowed me to take a nap on your sofa while you watched my children.
Tamarind extract – 1 tablespoon (optional – you may omit tamarind if you prefer a bland taste, also you may wish to add finely tomatoes instead)
Akt 3 - Blå Sol
Enjoy the rest of your weekend.
David Bryan – Keyboards, Piano
Utterly disappointed with life.
with the yew in my bow; sadly, sorry. Mouthlings are split.
So what exactly does happen to our children's brains as they watch TV?
The second volume of this tranquilizing series brings you the tunes of Mike Foyle, Saints & Sinners, Kai Tracid, Orjan Nilsen, Free World, Taucher and of course York himself!
eagerly awaiting the unwrapping of their wedding gifts
Lodge Bank Tavern pictured on 29 March 2011.
interesting, but not used that much. As with the standard oscillators, you can set the shape of the wobble using a very similar set of waveforms.
After a lot of shuffling back and forth, everything has a new place and I do not even have to get used to it.
Me: You better hope that falls off before we get back to the car!
The third and fourth ticket are for two jobs that will rotate from month to month. That is why they are on sticky notes in the photo, so I can move them around.
RB: Vick Ballard, Mississippi State
I know we are fortunate that this current peer group welcome Billy and I. We are a different package, for sure, in so many ways. I try to give as much as we receive, in what ever way we can, but really it's hard to quantify the exchange. Without turning my kid into a sideshow amusement, I want people to know how much their friendship means to him.
So what happened to Frankie Zak? Well, his contract was sold to the Yankees and he played for the famous Newark Bears, the same team my grandfather and his gang would try to bust into for free years before. He later played in the Pacific Coast League with Portland and San Diego before retiring in 1949, ending a 9 year odyssey in professional baseball. Wait, what about his friend he went to visit in Tarboro back in 1941? Well, Eddie Sudol never made the majors as a player, but he did make it as a National League umpire, working the World Series in 1965, 1971 and 1977 and it was Eddie Sudol who was behind the plate when Henry Aaron hit his 715th career home run.
Around eight we started pouring Andechser Spezial Hell. This mighty 5.8% lager is rarely seen on draught even in Bavaria, and proved so popular that I was busy for a solid half hour pouring glass after glass of it.
That's a risky move for a bunch of guys in their mid to late 40s. The current commercial hip-hop community probably aren't paying attention to them (although they get respect from the people who have a sense of history... and the fact that Nas guests on "Too Many Rappers" doesn't hurt either). The production doesn't sound like it has an ear to 2011, or even 2001. It's kind of timeless: on one hand, it sounds like old-school electro hip-hop. On the other hand, it's very futuristic, but not in the Black Eyed Peas Euro-rave-Blade Runner way. They don't work with outside producers - they produce the tracks themselves. Not many other hip-hop acts produce their own albums.
Not right now, but thanks again, Tracy!
PAIDAKIA 42
Hum....what shall we have for breakfast in Hue? Bún Bò Huế, of course! Our tour guide took us to a local hole in the wall place on Lý Thường Kiệt street. I have to say the Bún Bò Huế in Huế is very different from what I have had in Saigon or Seattle. The broth is not as pungent of lemongrass and shrimp paste and the fresh veggie mix has different herbs in it. Most noticeable is the addition for Rau Má.
The small scrawled graffiti is a let-down really! Not much passion, originality or creativity at all! The lack of punctuation, exclamation marks and capitalisation disturbs me slightly. I clutch the corner of my Walkman in my hand and begin to slowly scratch out some words on the dirty cell wall.
What can we do?
Wonder Boy wrote a chapter book at school. And here it is:
I read at Therese Fowler's blog, Making it Up that October is National Book Club Month, and it got me thinking. So many of us have towering TBR stacks, wouldn't it be nice if we could choose a book that lots of us want to read and target some future date that we'd like to blog about it? Just an idea. October is too far gone, but I'll take my inspiration from this month. Perhaps we could choose a book sometime over the next few weeks and then choose a date around the first of the year to blog about it -- no need to pressure ourselves more than we already do.
That unchanging part of you, is the real you, it is God, and it is the same as the unchanging part of me that is I and it is the same as the unchanging part of anyone or anything there is.
Life can be so sweet
To have met this way.
If all of you people who thought putting in Tea Party candidates was such a good idea, let me ask you one question:
Optional flavourings (in any combination)
Whose movement is service.
“I have in mind environmentalism (with its Earth First, not Freedom First principle), radical humanrightism (based – as de Jasay precisely argues – on not distinguishing rights and rightism), ideology of ‘civic society’ (or communitarism), which is nothing less than one version of post-Marxist collectivism which wants privileges for organized groups, and in consequence, a refeudalization of society. I also have in mind multiculturalism, feminism, apolitical technocratism (based on the resentment against politics and politicians), internationalism (and especially its European variant called Europeanism) and a rapidly growing phenomenon I call NGOism.”
The only ONE who can save us and our family is Jesus. Our work should be telling others about Him and living lives of obedience to His Holy Word, the Bible.
After writing and doing my list for Summer I wanted to do one for Winter too. I admit I don't like the cold months. I hate leaving the house in the dark and returning in the dark due to my crazy work schedule. I figured that if I made a list I might enjoy the Winter months a little more.
Riley looked at him. “Okay, I guess I can do that.”
2. Mewsette - Robert Goulet
M Sasikumar
Alumnae chapters should do just a little more this year than you did last year. For some, that might mean giving the collection boxes and posters to your members. Encourage them to put them out at their workplaces, churches, gyms, or other areas. Other chapters might host specific events and partner with grocery stores. Media loves this cause, so get a local radio station to give your event some PR!
Heres a short clip of the four from this week on the Nepean River. Its a cool feeling rowing up among these surroundings.
Whew!! Mystery solved!
I have a part time job where I've worked for nearly 6 years.
Among various problems. it perpetuates some idea that white majority is the natural or desired state of the USA. Look, when the “white” population falls below 50% it is just not the majority. OK? Deal with it. The term sounds like whities get together at my house on Wednesday while the blacks, browns, yellows, reds, and all other hues get together at Denzel Washington’s. It is just not that bipolar anymore. I’m not saying some sort of utopia of “i’d like to sing the world a song” will happen, just that identity, justice, controversy, politics, love and marriage, and schooling will be full of problems and promises in new ways.
Defy the boundaries
Newcastle United - £54,235,271
That I can bring
The above template is my variation of “The Hero’s Journey” by Joseph Campbell, the Holy Grail of storytelling. It’s a wondrous journey, an adventure, an escape, with fabulously real lands, weird food, bad weather, horrific villains with evil plans, the occasional noble death, brave and sassy heroines, and smoking hot heroes. Any combination of the above. Anything goes!
I haven't seen this movie, but I know all about it!
For a while the two coexisted, with a few other distant websites chattering about wine. An uneasy coexistence settled in, with both boards taking pot shots at each other. BUT, one could easily navigate from one to the other (unless you were banned from the Squires board - as far as I know no one is actually banned from Berserkers). While Berserkers encouraged free-wheeling (and occasionally sophomoric, to be honest) discussions about wine, Squires' censored all talk about its competition, whether blogs, boards or other critics. More and more people began to jump ship, sensing the end approaching.
A really interesting choice for P.M. would be Ahmed Mohamed ag Hamani, who served in this role from 2002 to 2004. He was President Touré’s first prime minister, which would also be a strike against him in the eyes of many, but he is also a Tuareg (well, technically un targui, which is the singular form). Appointing him to run Mali’s transition during this critical phase would send an important message to Tuareg everywhere, not to mention to non-Tuareg Malians, that the Malian state is truly committed to serving people of all ethnic groups and regions.
New Orleans tourism was hit hard by the hurricane, and more recently by the BP oil spill’s effects on its fishing industry. It’s just now getting back on its feet. Both times I’ve visited, the people I’ve met are so in love with their city and eager to share it with others. The people there have stories that are worth listening to, and the city itself has such an interesting history and recent past to explore.
Something for me to keep in mind: Avoid Hubris. Never forget the ease with which the weight comes back, the difficulty in losing it, and the inherent fallibility of the human nature.
The waitress who had first introduced them eventually brought a letter, delivered to the café and addressed to Beth. Beth tore the envelope open as soon as the letter reached her hand, and she began to read:
It's also my lovely Mother in Law's (Wendy) 70th Birthday this month as well and I have made a Tilda card for her. I can't remember what this Tilda is called, but she's doing a lovely 'hurrah' in the air, so she's lovely for birthdays. We are off down to 'Naarfek' (Norfork to normal northerners) this weekend for some lovely celebrations. That's me back off the diet, Wendy feeds us too well! Short one today, don't want to overdo it straight away! Have a lovely week K xx
When he moved in, the teenager was provided with Sky TV in his bedroom, a bicycle and a mobile phone.
So, if you have never tried coconut flour, its very easy to work with and can be easily purchased at any health food store.
Enough is enough?
When asked about the future of the unit, De Caire told the Spectator: “Project Rescue is a one-year pilot and we will be reporting back to the ministry with our results, analysis and comment.”
Since I wasn’t into the whole greeting thing, I opted for the eyebrows hello, that is when someone says hello I just look at them, and move my eyebrows up, and that’s it. That’s my hello, I don’t get the point of all of this, but I’ll make facial movements to let you know that I heard your hello.
1142. Egg Biscuit @ The Chateau de Mundeau (Asheville, NC) 8:51 p.m.
And while he was on the diet, I used to make stir fry for dinner once a week, which he always looked forward to. So today I decided to share this excellent stir fry recipe with you. Just look at all those colorful vegetables!
Shining in Love.
If convenient, season meat 2 days before cooking.
What makes you think so?
The apathy that I talked about in my first post (click here to view) has lessened since January in most aspects of my life, but it crept back in my actions toward myself. I was eating badly (in my terms, not in the terms of the average American), overscheduling, running myself ragged, and wearing myself down. Boo for me!
Music Consultant, Music Producer & College Speaker Loren Weisman works to help, assist & consult independent artists, musicians, bands, labels & managers to achieve sustainable success.
11.) Signed Slide Bookmarks from YA Author Jill Hathaway
The grass is freshly mowed and that sweet smell of spring is in the air, with everything blooming all at once. Makes you want to go barefoot and feel the earth between your toes...right?
All well and good.
TeAL stands for Transforming E-Assessment for Learning
Would you like to have total control over how your money is spent or used?
Or did they? I took a few more bites. I wasn’t about to toss or waste the dish, especially since I had little else to choose from. And quite frankly, the oatmeal was surprisingly thick and hearty compared to the thin syrupy gruel that instant packets typically produce. So what if it had a bit less flavor than usual? If it wasn’t a perfectly balanced mixture of sweet & salty, creamy & crunchy, if the dish didn’t boast an Eden-like array of nuts and berries, if it didn’t set off fireworks in my mouth and leave me toppled over in bliss? It was just one breakfast, for chrissakes! And it turned out to be a perfectly lovely bowl of oatmeal. Was it lacking, then, or was I?
They return back to the state they were in before
We have a lot of plans for the weekend, and I think it's going to be a good one. :)
Redevelopment has produced several archeological, landscape, building and excavation surveys and reports researched by researchers not of St Kitts but of learned universities and external consultancies. But the social history and culture of the Africans who constructed and maintained Wingfield over the centuries are largely absent. Today in the grant scheme of remembrance, the emphasis is on the ownership of the land and buildings and bringing the ruined estate into a condition where it can be purchased by visitors and title deed holders but most importantly to regain its once economic value and status outside of the context of the African contribution. Hotel and tourism is the new sugar and the ruined plantation is central to the sweetness. Today the ruined plantation offers large exclusive properties much like the big plantation houses of the 1817, with a physically-free African working population on 24/7 call, offering domestic services to dwindling tourist market, mainly in the interest of large European multinational corporations and oversees individuals who controls the hotel and tourism industry globally.
“Advanced dementia, but he’s not responding to standard petting-zoo therapy.”
Anyway, my lack of steam is pouring over into my blogging, and please do not think I'm not aware of it. I promise, very soon I'll have a really entertaining story about a close encounter with wildlife. In the meantime, maybe this dog video will tide you over.
the wall.
When I open the sewer lid, its not easy like the movies. It is very heavy and has no finger grips. You need a crow bar or other tool to do it easily.
Sunday, the venue that I have been eyeing for our reception was having an open house. So I decided to wait to do any tours until then, since it will be set up all fancy and what not for the open house. Well, unfortunately Alex couldn't come with us because he was working a 24 hour shift so I went with my parents. The venue was very nice and extremely accommodating. This was the first time my mom has a realization that her little girl is getting married. She said she had chills the whole time! Hahaha!
Later tonight I'll head over and do the tapping and venting. We will also see what temperature the lowest setting on the cooler is designed to achieve. I'm hoping for around 50 of those archaic but well-known Fahrenheit degrees (that's 10 of the trendy but aloof Celsius degrees). After a fine breakfast of a single strip of bacon, a double experso (as we call it) and a ginger cookie I'll be back down in Eugene to hook up the lines and ascertain the state of the swill, as you will.
Attended the workshop with Diana Bellew and Kelli Eastbourn on book covers. Then moderated the workshop with Angela Knight, Shiloh Walker and Cynthia Garner (our chapter member, Cindy Somerville). Angela is very funny. I told them the three of them should write an anthology. I may have created a monster.
In their article, Rushton and Jensen also address some of the policy issues that stem from their conclusions. Their main recommendation is that people be treated as individuals, not as members of groups. They emphasized that their paper pertains only to average differences. They also called for the need to accurately inform the public about the true nature of individual and group differences, genetics and evolutionary biology.
This will actually cover 2 weeks - last week & this week.
-The second supposition is that both national (e.g., USA Today, Wall Street Journal) and local newspapers cover topics that are more widely varying than magazines or TV, especially local newspapers since they also are attempting to cover stories of local interest.
babies sleepin on the floor there..
But I promised you a quick and dirty method. Here goes.
There will be no categories that will divide the professionals from the amateurs as Cayabyab believes this will create a real competitionwhere talent will be the driving force and not experience.
I recently made the mistake of reading the comments on the original copy of my “What Do People Need?” column on the Daily Nebraskan website. Upon reading the comments I realized that I could take down the entire column and replace it with a few sentences: “The columnist’s contention is that freedom at the cost of respect for human dignity is not a freedom worth having. In the pursuit of such “freedom,” we become little better than animals. The consequence of such a reckless pursuit can be readily viewed in the space below.”
Who is to blame them? I had gone down that road before, I had been a teenager too. I have taken up smoking in the past, had my share of public mischief, prowled the billiard rooms like some wannabe 'Ah Beng', kick asses in Arcade Centres playing Street Fighter, I understand all teenagers are assholes.
Thurman supports the United States Democratic Party, and has given money to the campaigns of John Kerry, Hillary Clinton, and Joseph R. Driscoll. She supports gun control laws, and in 2000, she participated in Marie Claire’s “End Gun Violence Now” campaign. She is a member of the board of Room to Grow, a charitable organization providing aid to families and children born into poverty. She serves on the board of the Tibet House. In 2007, she hosted the Nobel Peace Prize Concert in Oslo, Norway with actor Kevin Spacey. In 2011, Thurman became one of a handful of celebrity faces attached to USAID and Ad Council’s FWD campaign, an awareness push to combat the famine, war, and drought in the Horn of Africa
Yes, absolutely. Sarah made all of the difference for me. She gave me editorial advice and encouragement. She also had access to editors—and knowledge about what drew them to novels--in a way I never could have if I’d submitted on my own, dutifully one editor at a time.
But somehow Delaney survived—despite the brain scans that show irreparable damage. Everyone wants Delaney to be fine, but she knows she’s far from normal. Pulled by strange sensations she can’t control or explain, Delaney now finds herself drawn to the dying, and when she meets Troy Varga, a boy who recently emerged from a coma with the same abilities, she is relieved to share this strange new existence. Unsure if her altered brain is predicting death or causing it, Delaney must figure out if their gift is a miracle, a freak of nature—or something else much more frightening….
The fashion industry is a booming one and with everyone trying to chase after it to keep up with the latest trends, it can get a little tiring with the amount go magazines to refer too, the entertainment to watch and a whole lot of money to fork out simply because that top is simply too gorgeous, a must have; but so is that dress, those shoes and I have mentioned those new jeans? See what I mean? But here’s the thing, you can stay up with current styles and fancies by learning about the fashion of all seasons so that you don’t have to turn out your closet 4 times a month.
One doesn’t understand the Bible as one would a history book, by simple mental perception. It is a Spiritual enlightenment.
A good first sentence can teach you how to read a novel. It can tell you what the novel cares about and what you should watch for. The best first sentences are gem-like: a product of compression and value.
Too keep myself on track (and sane!) this month, there are a few things I want to focus on. The first thing I want to focus on is not obsessing about how my body looks. It is strong, it is healthy, and it is getting stuff done. Why am I so obsessed with changing it to fit someone else's standard? To that end, I am cutting down on my scale privileges to Sundays only. I tend to judge myself entirely on the number on the scale, not be any other standard, and that probably needs to stop. I am also starting once a month body measurements. Not to obsess over, but rather to give me proof that I'm improving, even if my weight is not changing.
In the total darkness, Jonah tells her to light a match. She gets one lit and out of the darkness, Jonah hands her his shirt, telling her to light it. Once it starts blazing we see....
Eliminated Couple: Jaleel & Kym
It is with deep regret that we ask you to click on the song link here for a final time before reading this blog post so that you may enjoy some very appropriate background music which we will forever remember as “Herman’s Theme”.
It's so much better to be prepared with a picnic for little ones rather than trying to get into a crowded restaurant for lunch on a hot day.
The moment you were born you started to die…Yup a nice 1:1 birth to death ratio
The point is, think about how you can build up the reviews for your live shows and your recordings, but also go after the reviews from those that work with you backstage and behind the scenes. It can help all that much more for those that are not locked on bringing you in or booking you.
If you take all the political analysts in the United States, and lay them end to end, they still won’t reach an intelligent conclusion.
Hips 43″ – 41 1/2″
But Mr Hale did not know if the detention centre needed a funding boost.
Although a perfect fit for the paranormal romance genre, A WITCH IN WINTER avoids fangs, excessive body hair and submissive female leads, and tells the heart-wrenching story of a couple meant to be together, but being forced apart. Seth is utterly irresistible and Anna is an empowered, proactive young woman with unimaginable magic inside her. This is fast-paced, sensuous writing with believable incantations inspired by Warburton's research into witchcraft legend and old English.
- San Marina
Contemporary society may have considered Owen mad; with the light of hindsight, his looks like the only sensible reaction to the insanity he witnessed. His poetry vividly evokes the horror of war. It's a shame we seem to have largely forgotten it, as we've moved to more high-tech types of warfare that allow us to distance ourselves from exploding limbs in far-flung countries. We should remember, if only so we never have to live through a battle like the Somme again.
Or I could get startled and fall out of the checkout line. What do you think?
Jade is a very lonely woman. She interacts with other people as little as possible for fear that they'll discover her power. Her self-imposed isolation is truly heartbreaking. She has absolutely no long term friendships and doesn’t trust anyone. Even though Jade fears how people will react to her healing power, she never hesitates to use it to help those who need. I was truly moved when she saved the life of a child she didn’t even know and would never see again. I admire her selfless and caring personality very much.
* Elaine Heng is the regional head of priority and international banking for Singapore and South-east Asia at Standard Chartered Bank.
He also said the red light camera program has been successful in changing behavior, as evidence by the reduced amount of tickets received. He said the extra cameras requested by Mangano would net about $6 million.
The flower is another handmade one, where I took a thin strip of fabric, folded it in half along the length before make even snips into the folded edge. I rolled the strip into a coil, applied glue and it was good to go.
Interestingly enough, a scientist, who was a major Climate Change skeptic (I'm too lazy to look up his name-well, Jebus, it's after 2 a.m., what do you expect?) did a study. That study was funded by, among others, the uberconservative Koch brothers. After completing that study this scientist determined that, surprise, surprise, climate change is not a fantasy cooked up by paranoid Democrats as claimed by Republicans everywhere, but a solid reality. Hmmmm. Go figure.
2.Remove from heat and cool down.
How different, how unchanging. I will walk back soon to my Mom's apartment, wrapping my pashmina around my neck with each step, rearranging it while waiting at the light. I will most likely be the only person not driving as I was on the way here. I'll keep an eye out for the cardinal that lives in the tree outside her front door. Weeks from now, I'll remember the bell-ringing "all-righty"'s and "You have a nice day now" as I walk around the Roman Arena in silence, utter silence knowing one is not better than the next, just different and unchanging.
This loose-powder mineral concealer is fortified with vitamins A and E. It will restore tired, dull eyes to a natural, healthy, awake look. Great coverage, blends well, and lasts a long time. The minerals have a creamy consistency to them, where they will just glide on your skin like butter.
I need some distraction oh beautiful release
Mr. B commands me up the stairs, which I accordingly hop up. Apparently my everyday behaviour (walking, talking, moving in general) becomes a tad affected when in the presence of greatness. I also find it difficult to stop rambling, even when various members of his household clearly don’t understand much English. Mr. B shows me the room I’ll be sleeping in and mentions that I may have a bed partner; the Iranian receptionist I met earlier. Success! My need for nighttime company satisfied (I miss you, Fiona!). As I lay my bag on the floor, Mr. B asks if I’d like to take a rest – but with his next breath then directs me to the last room of the second floor (this is my first introduction to his topic-jumping mentality), where a priest sings and the girls sit with their heads covered, alternately joining the singing and checking their Blackberries. I walk into the room and am pulled out again just as quickly, where a blue handkerchief is placed atop my bare head. I tie it under my chin and, feeling slightly like a farmer’s wife, sit cross-legged on the floor. Being quiet is coming more easily now.
You can call me a liberal extremist or a wuss. You can call me a sorta crunchy granola mom. Those would not be correct, but if by having a problem with this, you want to call me that, I could care less because I think the biggest shame is this:
Answers by MJ, 16
“Look, I promise there’s nothing for you or Cal or anyone else to worry about. It was just between Bennett and me and whatever happened, it was all my fault. Nothing like that is going to happen to any of your tutors.” A hard lump seemed to settle to the bottom of his stomach when he realized that he’d just confirmed Cal’s suspicion about what happened.
Now we are going through the adoption process for a second time I will need to think about toddler groups again. Thankfully Katie's best friends mum has a younger daughter of 14 months, so the chances are we'll have second children around the same age. Katie will have started big school by the time our second daughter joins us and I suspect it will be fairly obvious to the other parents at the school gates that we've adopted when another child suddenly joins us. I'm more clued up now about the local groups that are running and which activities I'd like to participate in. I am more confident about when I tell our story now. I find just asking lots of questions of other people can nicely deflect any questions direct towards me. People actually like to talk about themselves for the most part so this is fairly easy to do. I tell some people that Katie is adopted. I trust my instincts and generally get a sense of who I can tell and who I don't want to tell. I am always mindful that, whilst this is my story, it is also Katie's story and she may not want people to know she is adopted as she gets older. People have been generally very positive when I tell them though. They are curious and ask questions but, aside from some of the comments I discussed in my last blog on the topic of "The Silly Things People Say About Adoption", are very accepting.
Also Sprach Zarathustra (Richard Strauss, 1896): I first heard this 1968, when I saw 2001: A Space Odyssey at the Odeon, Leicester Square with my cousin, Gerhard. It was stunning; I bought the sound track as soon as I could. This got me into classical music: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=o09L-hkrzhw and also the ‘Dawn of Man’ scene from the same film: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U2iiPpcwfCA – the film and music had such a big impact on my intellectual development. It would take ages to explain, so I won’t bore you with it!
With @occupyPOPS the participation in a weekly, mini-occupy event in a POPS occurs either online and offline or online-only. I’ve programmed the bot to tweet quotes from theorists about the politics of public space, body, and spatial tactics of Occupy. Instead of having these 140 character quotes tweeted at intervals during the week, I’m thinking that they could be broadcasted during the occupy events that the bot coordinates. In this case, each event will appear on twitter to have someone attending the event in virtual space as if in the physical location of a POPS.
Pete's back and spotted an ambandoned building we don't normally have access to. Cue a fun shoot where where we both wander through nettles and have fun working with some great backdrops. One of us also had a similar experience to Winnie the Pooh:
If I could get out of this place"
So what do you do when you have zucchini coming out of your ears? Try the following ideas that are a bit off the beaten path:
Now, splitting the undecided votes not only puts the other swing states I listed into the solid Romney camp but it appears to also put Pennsylvania barely into the plus Romney side (probably more solidly Romney as the most recent and reliable poll I can find on Pennsylvania is both pre-Santorum dropping out and a registered voter poll which actually means Romney should win by 2 to 3 points). Pennsylvania’s 20 electoral votes would put Romney over 270. The fact that Ohio is also in striking distance makes Romney’s options even stronger.
The winner is yammering away and he has dark circles around his eyes. Looks like the masks Robin wore in Batman & Robin..
My project for this challenge is Layout that I put into a shadowbox and will add one of my Maternity Pictures into when we get them done in November. Enjoy!
I’d go to check the weather online and type in my zip code and the next thing I’d see, on the pages with the weather forecast – ads for water damage restoration experts.
Since brown sugar is not readily available in Kerala, mamma substitutes it with 3/4th cup of sharkara paani (jaggery syrup) or a cup of jaggery. If using the syrup, make sure you use 2 cups of boiling water instead on 1 3/4.
Common questions that are raised after reading this article.
VIDEO QUALITY: A+
Step#4 – Once you are registered with some companies keep an eye out for jobs that interest you. When I started I took on any and every job that came across my email inbox. After awhile I started to realize some jobs were fun and worth my time, while others….eh, not so much. Make sure you read the guidelines before accepting a job. How much time do you have to commit? If a purchase is necessary, how much is it and can you afford it while waiting to be reimbursed? How long will it take to get reimbursed?… Etc.
“You have to do what God gives you peace about,” Bruce adds. The decision to care for Lacey in their home gave them peace. To accommodate their new lifestyle, Bruce changed employers. “I used to have a job where I traveled and was gone all the time. We knew when Lacey was a year old that I was going to have to be home a lot more.”
Do you fight the urge to procrastinate? What helps you face what you want to avoid?
As you can see, my driveway is steep (steeper than it looks in the photo) and long. It continues up and out of the range of the photo to the right for another good 30 feet, at least. Her 12-year-old daughter and her little brother (about 3 or 4) went sledding down the driveway the past couple of days - having a great time on their little plastic sleds.
As soon as we got out onto the man road the wind hit us. At least it would be on our backs on the way home! We had the luxury of running on a path the full length of the road into Kendal – nothing like what we’re used to back home! Almost immediately hubbie started to complain of a muscular pain across the bottom of his stomach which later seemed to travel down his legs as he rain. He said it was quite sore and had to stop a few times. I was concerned because it sounded like a hernia type pain, but know him well enough not to show my anxiety. I was happy to stop when he needed to rather than make him run through what sounded like bad pain. As it was we weren’t running that slowly, although stopping to cross roads was a bit of a pain in itself. We ran into the town and did the shortest loop I could find for him before heading back up towards the campsite.
Well… yes and no. Our new album has more dimensions to it than that, but you’re right that is definitely a fairly definitive characteristic of our band. Partly autobiographical but also looking out in the world and I guess we have a general sense of humans being stifled, in many, many ways, and a sense that life should feel more free than it does.
Don’t you let Twilight try to sell you
I also don't doubt that digital will dominate print, just as it has dominated music, TV, film, communications, etc.
The prize will be a $20 voucher for you spend on my new website coming soon!!!!
A: The USS Enterprise from Star Trek is a cultural icon, and we should latch part of the US space program on to this icon and build from there. We need a far grander vision of what we should be doing to get humans up into space and how we might gain a permanent foothold there. If we aren’t going to get a sustainable presence up there, then we should stop spending money for putting humans into space and instead focus on robotic missions like sending more advanced rovers to Mars, Venus, and elsewhere. If we are going to ask taxpayers to pay billions of dollars for projects to put Americans into space, it should be for an idea that they can relate to and be inspired by. The general form and characteristics of the spaceship should be inspirational – and building the first generation of USS Enterprise would surely be inspirational.
Yes, that's it.
Where was Bill?
“You have heard that it was said, “Love your friends, hate your enemies”. But now I tell you, love your enemies and pray for those who persecute you, so that you may become the children of you Father in heaven.”
I've been thinking a lot about stubborn lately, mostly because I recently wrote a novel about the Titanic titled By the Light of the Silvery Moon. Talk about some stubborn people.
And never fear entry into my own heart again.
Kurt Loder talks about Nirvana drummer Dave Grohl's "new" band The Foo Fighters and how, in the next few days, they'll be launching a debut tour in Tempe, AZ and opening up for Mike Watt. Loder also adds how Nirvana bassist Christ Novoselic still plays music but has yet to join a new band. It closes out with live footage of Nirvana playing "Lithium".
Australian Government. Taking preventative action: Government’s response to Australia: the healthiest country by 2020. Canberra: Department of Health and Ageing, 2010.
Black honey is incredibly sheer and provides what I believe is one of the most universally flattering shades of deep rich color. Your lips will look naturally flushed, not Morticia-like. And if you are still scared, Clinique has released a whole line of honey hues...each with a different tone that suits your particular need.
Because no one is there. Because in those still quiet moments before Yawkey Way is closed off for the game day traffic of food vendors and the throng of crimson-clad diehards and bandwagon jumpers (the dreaded pink hats, in the local lexicon, so dubbed for the women’s pink ballcap that the club started hocking around the time when Johnny Damon was still a hirsute matinee idol in those parts), when custodial workers are spraying down the street, when the Yawkey Way Souvenir Store (surely one of the best located retail spots in the country) has yet to give its first ballpark tour of the day, the true magic and grandeur of the place is revealed. As the sunlight gradually illuminates the exterior corners of the old girl, the aged concrete crevices of Yaz and Teddy Ballgame’s day seem to perfectly blend with the reconstructed brick and Green Monster Seats of the Pedroia/Pedro/Nomaaah era. It’s a fitting metaphor for the cocktail of nostalgia and modernism that is the Red
Mother Nature had other plans. Outside is a torrential downpour, which is supposed to continue for the next 48 hours.
Goodbye my friend.
In the broken pot,
According to The Rules of Typography, boldface text is to be used sparingly. “Reserve boldface for items that can be set entirely in bold, and avoid mixing with normal, or non-boldface, text,” says the typo rule-maker.
Before entering the expansive compound, P. and I removed our shoes, paid a few rupees for those ubiquitous blue shower caps to wear over our bare feet, and covered our heathen Episcopalian heads. And as we stepped into the sprawling courtyard the murmurs of the pious suddenly gave way to the echo of a million tiny gossamer wings. Mukul smiled and pointed heavenward. Seventy feet up in the sandstone domes of the mosque hung hundreds of colonies of wild Indian honeybees. I'd never seen anything like it my life. Black and amber fins of honeycomb jutted from the pink rock like enormous bisected mushroom caps, and we must have sat open-mouthed, dumbfounded beyond words, for twenty minutes just marveling at the majesty of the whole affair- the industrious bees pouring in and out of their lofty, teeming hives, the call to prayer echoing out over the parapets as the sun set over the city, barefoot boys screaming in glee as a game of cricket commenced in the dirt lot outside the mosque- an extraordinary vignette of rituals both human and animal. Or, your standard Friday evening in Agra. Have a lovely weekend.
HOW: Donate off bottled water, ready to eat food (i.e. crackers, biscuits, cookies, packaged buns/cakes), juices, milk, canned goods, medicines at the drop-off point.
So here are the three best things I love about Heirloom Market BBQ -
You can make about 3 luggage tags out of a flag, depending on how you make them. I made one where you slide in an information card. And the 2nd one is a tag designed simply to locate your luggage. I also changed it up, where one is made completely from a flag, strap and all. And the other is made with an elastic piece for the strap. So there is flexibility here! This doesn't have to be made out of a toms flag either. I liked the thicker canvas fabric, but its really up to you! I'm sure there are WAY better tutorials out there. But as I've said before...sewing isn't really my thing. So I just make it up as I go!
Exhibition opening: 6pm, Wednesday 5th April 2012.
Rose just sat there seeming to have no care in the world.
This picture would move. Bear with us, Vivid Mother.
We had to move sooner rather than later. There was no offer in Board Chair Don Vrooman’s email to our parent applicant suggesting an alternate, future date anyway. So we took to the pavement with our placards and made some harmonious noise.
So, both of us shoe-less, run out of her door, to find the Bristol City Marching Band ...well.... marching and bag-piping down her street!
I’ve always believed that if you have adequate safety and security measures at a party, you can prevent tragedy.
In my years of working in ministry I’ve seen more criticism to those doing the hard work of ministering from those that weren’t in their shoes than I believe I ever would see working in a “secular” job. Why, people? Just because we share the same faith, doesn’t mean we become experts in every aspect of it, or working in the roles God calls us to. There’s a reason why the Bible talks about the body and each person having their role to play. It’s because we aren’t all called to the same things, we don’t have the same giftings, and we can’t possibly understand every calling out there and what it takes to carry it out. There are reasons why some are called to work in pastoral ministry, and some in hospice care. Some are called to be teachers, and others prophets. Not everyone is equipped to leave their current life behind and go live in another culture like a missionary. There are reasons for this, in the same way that not everyone is a brain when it comes to math and building things, and not everyone can do childcare without dropping from exhaustion. And within those roles, there is still more room for our unique personalities and giftings. No two pastors will pastor the same way, and no two missionaries with work in the field in the same way. Yet, for some reason, within the Church we have no end of criticism and advice for those that minister around us.
or burden him
I ruffle Moon the Mod dog whippet on the head -
Cheery Lynn Designs gets lots of emails from people who want to make flowers like they see here on the Inspiration blog. One of those requests was to explain how to make roses with the Miniature, Medium and Large Rose dies. So I have done a step by step tutorial that I wanted to share with you today.
Selection trials are in another month, and athletes and horses are continuing their quest to complete their qualifications. The Biltmore Challenge was held in Asheville, NC during the weekend of May 1, an important FEI ** and *** event for endurance; with near-perfect weather conditions (although there had been predicted thunder storms/storm cell to arrive mid-day, the weather held off until later in the evening, when most riders/horses had completed the course) and no mud on course this year, it proved to be a challenge, never-the-less for many athletes. Yours truly did not complete the course on my alternate horse prospect, being eliminated at the end of the fourth phase (at 70 miles) for left front lameness. Running out of time to qualify this particular horse - my primary mount will be my nominated horse for the selection trials.
and, then i will stop bothering at all.
Digital Infrared Thermometers – Options and Prices
HOLLLLLYYYYY ILLLLLLLLNNNNESSSSSS YA'LL. Ugh. Did you miss me? I've been face down in bed for a few days. It turns out I have strep. And it turns out that strep is like death climbing into your body and turning it inside out. I always thought it was like, a really bad sore throat. Ahaha. No. I got a big shot of antibiotics in my behind though, and I'm hoping I'll feel more like a human soon. And holy crap, let me tell you, that shot is no joke. I can still feel 24 hours later. Woof.
So yes, it is cool there is home brew in the White House. What is uncool is that there are no pictures of the White Brewing rig.
Any woman who has looked into implant surgery knows that there are two main choices in terms of the materials to be used in their implants: saline and silicone gel-filled implants.
I feel a little panicky when I can't get enough air. First thing this morning, I sent an email to my trials nurse letting her know what’s going on.
bend
in ways that no-one but the objects of their Loving-kindness will ever know.
The Catholic Church has a long tradition of conveying truth through art. We need to take this art out from under the bushel basket while at the same time continuing to create beautiful art for the glory of God.
Just don't ask me what it was (3x)
Unofficial initial results from the first two days of Egypt’s parliamentary elections pointed to a dominant showing for Islamist candidates, fulfilling most analysts’ expectations that conservative religious politicians could have the upper hand in next year’s drafting of a new Egyptian constitution.
I paired the image with paper from Basic Grey and used a Memory Box die, Madera Corner to created the leaf/vine corner accent. Add a ribbon and a few flowers and viola! A cheerful card for Spring. Now, I just need Spring to arrive!
BeGoDo courageously and GLY!
I'm quite shocked that I managed to drop three more pounds this week given the late night Whataburger run on Thursday, the 13 or 14 Shiners I drowned my football loving sorrow in during the Saints loss and the 4, yes 4 Philly Cheesesteak sandwiches I consumed to soak up all that beer.
* Why do you pray to the Mother Mary and Saints? From my readings of the Bible, it doesn’t say anywhere to do this. The only way to God is through His son, not his mother or saints.
The alimony is suppose to end this month but they took it out of my check again, so I am praying that it ends by my next check. I am so sick and tired of this woman that I could just throw up. Oh, I forgot she conned another dumbass like me to buy her a new car. She is driving a brand new 2009, while her daughter I am sure is driving my 2007, which I am going to trade as soon as I get it. So as you can see after all that my girl has been right by my side.
against the cold window
We fell in love with and lost a bank owned property last month. It gave us this grand idea that we could find a beautiful foreclosure home and walk away with a mortgage not much more than our current town home.
God and Man
I have not even started my shopping just yet..
make out the woman giving birth under a tree.
Depending on the age of your baby, and time you want in diapers (full time, part time, day time, etc) will vary the amount of diapers you will need to be successful. This kit, which retails for $120.00 is enough to get a good part time start for an older baby to toddler who on average will only go through 5-7 diapers a day, to include overnight. How awesome is that!
Biz: Have you ever met a girl that you tried to date, but a year to make love she wanted you to wait?
Beautiful
Beer B had very little aroma, and what it delivered was more along the lines of alcohol, with slight marker/acetone notes. Light and alomost wine-like, with a grape skin tannic edge bringing up the rear. Slight bitter almond/marzipan traces.. Overall, fruity in a grape-like way, juicy and a crisp tannic finish that I liked.
Have you ever been out looking for a “home” and all the “list” you have just didn’t fit your fancy? Of suit your needs? Are you thinking…grrrr…I have to run back to the office/home and look up additional information?
I've been a busy girl today, but didn't accomplish very many things off my list. I haven't worked on that baby quilt and I didn't get laundry sorted and put away- both things that really need done. But I did have a bit of fun and got a few other things done.
14C Sierra Nevada Hoptimum 10.4%
artistic and has put huge emphasis on color and imagery.
Our own House made Double IPA,as fresh as it gets with 3 pounds per barrel of American Hops.
But, most of the time my mom used to give us whippin’s with her hand. I remember dodging her hand as she tried to swipe us while we were in the car. I mentioned before that my mom had burned her hand when she was a baby and had a swirl of scars on the palm of her hand that was witch like. We DID NOT want that hand to touch us. Ew. So, we zigged and zagged when she was swatting at us. Since she didn’t have a pocketbook big enough to hide her paddle, when we were out in public, so “The Hand” had to suffice.
In his mind, the other possibility resounded complete.
*Revelations That Crushed My Mind-THERE COMES A POINT WHEN The Teachers Who Helped Build Your Faith Will Abandon It And Integrity Is Viewed As Weakness By Lovers, It Is In These Moments When You Define Great Lines Of Character For Yourself For THE MOST CRITICAL DECISIOSN ARE MADE In The Absence Of Emotionalism&BESIDE YOURSELF.
4. Be Quiet
I always wondered why the Mormon church was able to retain it’s non-profit status, since it has its hands in so many political campaigns and in the state of Utah’s government, and since it funds huge political campaigns like the recent California “vote yes on prop 8″ campaign and so many other human and civil rights issues. It’s actually a common question: How does a not-for-profit entity (church) give money for political aspirations and campaigns and influence an entire state or countries opinions in local and state elections, and still retain their non-profit status?
All orders received since Friday will be posted on Tuesday, October 4.
As vivid as the pictures Honor conjures up are, she appears to have set up two competing impulses in French men's fashions: a carefree and exuberant experimentalism in dress, not hidebound by convention as their contemporaries over the Channel were (who might well have considered some of the outfits she describes as outré, bordering on the effeminate), and at the same time an urge to copy those conventional Englishmen. To be fair, she later clarifies these contradictory elements, describes in detail the Frenchman's preoccupation with correct, 'classic' dress, and sums up the "French male costume at its best" as "a nice blend of reason and fantasy, harmonizing the wishes of the individual with what he conceives to be the demands of the community."
The video stuff yesterday was awesome: if you were late, you missed the movie trailer for GENESIS. Then of course the "siltent film" about Jesus' death and resurrection! The staff were real gamers for dressing up and playing the part, our video guy Scott - great job.
According to the NER, equipment owners should register their equipment immediately. The next step is to consider your insurance coverage. Although, most business owners take the insurance offered by the leasing company, an inland marine policy may be your most cost effective avenue and the best defense against financial loss due to equipment thieves. Adding the equipment to your current business policy may also be an option so speak with your agent or contact the NSA Group with any additional questions.
It's four weeks before the strange couple are accepted in their various peer groups. Even then the association is tenuous and attributed to their 'ability' to perform some needed task, rather than their scintillating personalities.
If our good women are to continue in their primary roles as nurturers, teachers, homemakers, and managers, they will need more support and help in order for them to find time to give compassionate service to their families and others. If this help is withheld, our lives, our homes, the Church, and the world will be the poorer, for so much love, gentleness, and understanding will be lost. Elder Faust (The Highest Place of Honor –May 1988)
I have a new card to share. It is a Birthday card I made for my pretty niece Josée.
‘I don’t get it’, I say, ‘I doesn’t make sense to me. I’ve tried doing the maths but it’s just too hard. You’ll have to explain it to me. Because, after all, you did exactly the same thing.’
~~~~~noonish
And here’s the Wall Street Journal’s somewhat half-hearted response to the allegations. In it, they deny any wrong doing, point the finger at the whistleblower if there was any wrongdoing, firmly asserting that the scam was above board, but also that they’re ending it because it appears to be cockeyed. Nothing like covering all your bases. We didn’t do anything wrong, even if it really looks like we did, and if we did, it wasn’t us, it was the guy over here who we fired in January, and we only kept things going until someone else found out about it and it looked bad. But it’s okay now because we’ve stopped it. It’s all good. You can trust us, we’re the Wall Street Journal!
My Grandma had breast cancer. Twice. The first time, she beat it into remission with sheer willpower and faith in God. She had a mastectomy and then had radiation. She called her radiation treatments her "zingers". She would tell me not to worry because if it was her time, she was ready. She had an amazing attitude.
The majority of the book, besides the prologue and epilogue, took place over three days. Those three days contained a lot of information and action. Mass hysteria, starvation, end of the world predictions make for the perfect time for a religious fanatic to step in and control people with their fears. It is some crazy and intense stuff all throughout the book.
You see this waterfall? Yep, I swam under it. My sister very accurately described how it felt: like swimming in bottled water. The water was so cool, refreshing and clear, I swear Aquafina comes in at night and bottles it to ship to your local Wal-Mart.
I backed into a doorway and slid down,
The # pfc2012 is the second edition of Pensar Fora da Caixa/Thinking Outside the Box, an event about creativity that happens to 14 and April 15 in Coimbra. This year we are dedicated to the importance of curation at a time when everyone selects their own content.
(P) 2010 Made In ???
Anyone in the publishing industry (and readers alike) know the old adage ‘you can’t judge a book by its cover’ is rubbish. A cover is the very first thing your book will be judged on. If your cover isn’t eye-catching—particularly as a thumbnail—then the reader will by-pass it without a second glance. You can buy a decent eBook cover for as little as $40. if your eBook isn't selling, why not try a new cover? Money well spent!
I choose to find it fun and easy to think up new ideas for my businesses in Jesus Christ Name! Amen!
3. Donate baked goods (please label with ingredients). Baked goods can be dropped off Friday, April 13th (3pm – 8pm) or on Saturday, April 14th by 8am in the SMS Cafeteria.
Reed got his feet wet in 2011, when he was called up in September. His fastball and slider impressed and paid dividends in 2012. Addison made the parent club out of spring training and has been virtually lights out through April. Smart money has Reed eventually settling into a closer role, but with Chris Sale's move back to the bullpen from the rotation, that could be delayed further. Until that time, his dominating stuff will work well in the late innings.
The whole whiskey category is up, but only modestly, so there are some winners and losers. In 2010, Irish Whiskey slipped past Single Malt Scotch (SMS) and widened its lead in 2011.
“Oh, that’s a nice name,” Mister Rogers says, and then goes to the Thirty-fourth Street escalator to climb it one last time for the cameras. When he reaches the street, he looks right at the lens, as he always does, and says, speaking of the Neighborhood, “Let’s go back to my place,” and then makes a right turn toward Seventh Avenue, except that this time he just keeps going, and suddenly Margy Whitmer is saying, “Where is Fred? Where is Fred?” and Fred, he’s a hundred yards away; in his sneakers and his purple sweater, and the only thing anyone sees of him is his gray head bobbing up and down amid all the other heads, the hundreds of them, the thousands, the millions, disappearing into the city and its swelter.
I will be back on Thursday with a gift wrap idea--so make sure to check back in.
Parades
Here's the link. Just click and hit the Like button.
Luke 2:15
With no memory we repeat our lives. Repeat our mistakes.
As the solstice nears, our solar system is entering a different part of the galaxy, a new spectrum of vibration. Higher frequency energy is pouring into the existing energy field of the planet. The Earth itself is adapting – the climate, the atmosphere, and the electromagnetic field are changing. We can’t always see it, but we can feel it.
Its text addresses the Arabic speaking “children of Israel”.
I can't wait to see the babies in a few weeks!! Yippee!
Now. About that soup I was telling you about.
This girl right here. She melts my heart. Her brain works in such a unique way. She always surprises me. I'm the mom...I can gush...this is my blog...gushing will continue throughout this post.
The establishment, change and revocation of a monitoring point shall be subject to expert evaluation.
2) Breastfeeding: Yes or No? No. I wanted to breastfeed and I tried everything. Within 3 days of birth, my milk production was 15 mL total every 3 hours. Not enough for a newborn. He jaundiced. I spent hours with a lactation consultant, checking my latching, positioning, all of it. I pumped for over a month every 3 hours and took herbal rememdies. By the end of the therapy regimen my production was maxed around 30-50 mL total. It quickly dried up when I stopped the herbs and pumping. I use Born Free BPA bottles and the pediatrician recommended formula, so I did the best I could for my son. It really annoyed me how many moms would comment on my bottles while I was at the midwives for a check up or the chiropractor’s for an adjustment or even in the lactation consultant’s waiting room. It’s not like I had a choice, but they were very assertive about what I should try next. One even suggested some pretty severe synthetic drugs that would force my body to produce but I refused to go that far since the drugs would transfer through the milk.
2/3 c. walnut pieces
Open internationally and an international winner may get a smaller book or a $5.00 GC if I decide the mailing is too much.
requests, had not been repaired in six months. In addition large and
Thanks Cassie for letting me share your awesome solution and system today!
I took my knitting out there, and it was calming to knit the rows back and forth . . .
As in His living and burning wrath.
This savory cake goes very well with either sour cream or plain yogurt topped with chopped chives.
Today's recipe however, is inspired by a dish from Cafe Gitane - a small little restaurant a few blocks away from the hustle and bustle of Soho. The food there is incredibly flavourful and rustic and reminds me of my days studying at the French Culinary Institute a few blocks from there. It was the perfect place to grab a quick meal after a long day in the kitchen. The service at the cafe is a little harder to digest however - and most times I've been there I have been greeted by a hipstered waitress who seems rather unenthusiastic at the thought of handing you a menu or finding you a seat. She gestured for us to sit at the bar - which ended up being a real blessing in disguise - it was right in front of the open kitchen. The entire kitchen at the cafe is the size of a small NYC bathroom but still manages to be perfectly organized. In a few seconds, I was happy to be away from the wannabe actors and models seated at various small tables behind us and could concentrate on what really mattered: the food! One of the specialties here are baked eggs. The ones at Gitane are served with either merguez sausages, or salmon and potatoes. These are my version, made with tomato and feta. It's a really easy recipe and a nice way to turn eggs into a complete weeknight meal or a lovely weekend brunch.
About 50 years ago, Sandia Peak was all about skiing. Robert Nordhaus, an avid skier visited the Swiss Alps and decided that a tramway could lift skiers off the desert floor, to the 10.678 feet to the ski launch area instead of the long hour and a half drive to the other side of the mountain. The above picture of the tram gondola during the winter was cooling to look at in our 83 degree weather. In fact, this winter past brought 130 inches of snow and was their best year ever, attributed to climate change. And, the mountain climate can vary by 30 degrees from the valley floor. A lovely prospect on a hot day.
*And finally, Sir Lancelot is at a big meeting at Chateau de Touffou. For those of you that don't know, this is the Chateau where David Ogilvy retired with his wife. Since his passing, she still lets larger summits take place there and during Ogilvy orientation, you see photos and HR tells you all about Touffou to the point where you really want to go but know that it's basically impossible. The entire place seems very magical. Sir L sent me a text tonight to tell me he's staying in David Ogilvy's writing room. The same room where he wrote the famous book, Confessions of an Advertising Man. I told him he better be doing major mobile uploads to Facebook.
So i was getting sick of feeding charlotte the same foods over and over again and wanted to find a few recipes just to help out.
I purchased the English Bible of French Cuisine: The Art of French Cooking by Julia Child and her two culinary cronies Louisette Bertholle and Simone Beck.
St Louis today also reported that a woman obtained an order of protection in 2008 against Vanvlerah, then 18, accusing her of seducing and having sex with the woman’s 16-year-old autistic son.
So far enlightenment of this sort was fortunately man’s affair, man’s lot—we remained “among ourselves” in this; and whatever women write and “woman,” we may in the end reserve a healthy suspicion whether woman really wants enlightenment about herself—whether she can will it[17]
Recognition registered on Kanhar’s face. His orders were to kill this pastor in the quest to wipe out Christianity. His eyes wandered around the yard, searching for anything he could use as a weapon.
like this a little each time due to the fact that both of my birds
Apparently, there are 4 different styles of parenting: the Authoritarian, the Authoritative, the Permissive, and the Neglectful parent. Never mind that the Authoritarian and the Authoritative sound like they should be the exact same thing. They’re not. The Authoritarian is the Nazi Tiger Mom who always says, “Do it because I said so.” The Authoritative parent is a Democratic Leader under Marshall Law. She says, “You must do it this way AND THIS IS WHY.” The why, the explanation, is the big difference between Nazi Mom and Democratic Leader During a Riot. Then there’s Permissive Dad. This guy is the one who smokes pot with his kid and maybe gets too chummy with the kid’s girlfriends. He lets everything slide, but the kids mostly still go to him for counsel because, well, they can tell him everything. He’s more like their friend. Lastly, you have the Neglectful parent. This can vary from Highly Medicated/ Nervous Breakdown Mom to Totally Abusive Mom.
Peter Tremayne – The Foxes of Fascoum
Ieri è stata una giornata molto speciale.
-Wax paper
of loan programs. Mary Lou is committed to providing professional, first-class service to her
On my travels and beset by some miserable connectivity, I've not been able to keep the flow of posts going as I would have liked. It is therefore with both thanks and apologies that I bring you this note which The SPC Blog received from Marjan Noor and Andrew Hutchinson (Simmons & Simmons LLP) last week:
On your toasted bun place 2 meatballs and add any desired toppings.
Today I started to ride my bike,
Let me be honest . . . Brigham is a fussy baby. Don't worry, we still love him with all of our hearts. But man, it's difficult to handle on 4 or 5 hours of sleep!
Now, I’m kind of thinking of this as a let-down. No matter what happens Jose Reyes is no longer a Met. I don’t know why we’re treating this like a World Series appearance.
When my child hits another child, it's like he tripped and fell. After it has happened, I first make sure both kids are safe. Then, just like I would try to figure out what he tripped over, I figure out what is bothering the one who did the hitting. And just as I would try to prevent him from tripping over the same thing again, I take actions to make sure he doesn't hit again right then.
According to the criminal complaint, in August 2010, the defendant offered $100 to a DOI undercover investigator posing as a DOB inspector to avoid a violation against her residential property on 130th Street in Queens.
Gill - The Vintage Gardener
Jaglom's films for me were like cinematic hugs. Finally I had found someone that really understood what I was feeling. A good friend, that had experienced the same as I. Henry Jaglom is a man searching for the truth, in life, love, romance and lust, and somehow, he captures it with his camera. These aren't just movies. They're truthful, albeit epic and profound tales of the human condition. Jaglom's films are true stories of someone searching for the answer to life's questions.
After Genhiz Khan had been proclaimed ruler of all Mongols in 1206, the empire grew, not through peace and prosperity within their own ranks, but through the murderous invasion and rape of millions of people from other nations.
- she's trying so hard to walk! Not too much longer. We think we inhibited her walking by putting her into her walker - which she's a speed demon in!
Before you call CPS, it was just for a second and I don't plan on giving him sugar again for a LONG time. Just thought he might want a taste :)
Have a wonderful wobbly day!
Though right now in India everybody says is winter, it does not feel like winter to me, or at least the winter ‘I know’ of. It is more like spring. Sunny, hot during the day, and maybe ready to wear a long sleeve shirt in the evening, with lots of fruits to choose from. Though I wish I could have some cherries, like the ones we had in our backyard growing up.
"The artist has studied this world of variety and has, we may suppose, unobtrusively found his way in it. His sense of direction has brought order into the passing stream of image and experience. This sense of direction in nature and life, this branding and spreading array, I shall compare with the root of the tree.
I drew a red line from the top of Bristol’s head over to where Todd was standing. I know Sarah and Todd are standing in the background but that shouldn’t affect their heights (unless they are 20 yards behind the rest of the group and that would be rather strange). The ground also looks relatively flat. Palin’s face is also a lot smaller than the people in front of her.
- Put each phrase in a zip-loc bag with a picture fastened to the front of how it was used. (shared by Meredith)
NBC.com has more surveys than other sites
The offer lasts until March 1st.
Nicole: I'm waiting to hear back from beta readers on my MG fantasy story which I hope to start querying before the end of the year.
07 - I'll wait (Album version) (4:46)
In sum total, this author will argue that modern U.S. foreign policy must adopt the fundamental precepts of the “clear-eyed” realpolitik advocated by Dr. Henry A. Kissinger. The reliability, pragmatism, and national humility of this return to American realism will allow us to tolerate our natural civilizational decline while guaranteeing our physical survival as a nation through the 21st Century.
1 opted
Pink Floyd- Up The Khyber
This event seeks to encourage reading, promote Spanish-language books and foster recognition of the Latino population, their culture and customs. LéaLA is an initiative backed by the University of Guadalajara at Los Angeles and the Guadalajara International Book Fair (FIL).
Before I rip apart my old dice bag, I want to make it clear that I really enjoyed this bag when I first bought it a couple of years ago. It has a nice felt exterior and a satin-ish internal barrier that keep the dice feeling nice and cozy. However, you can see that it is already full from the four sets of dice, and three sets are left out in the cold. Also notice that the bag needs to be tied up or else the dice inside will spill out onto the table. I will discuss this in more detail below, but it is another feature of the Dragon Chow bags that is great for your gaming needs.
? Other Vocal Conditions
adventure: first time to the ballet! amazing! Carmen. The muscles and the movements of the dancers were fabulous. the emotions shown through their bodies, their expressions, their motions. the music puts you in the dance floor. you feel as if it’s you in the middle. the movement keeps going and going and amazing and amazing.
Ok, this one is from a good friend of mine. Others can see your faults more easily than you can, so I asked his opinion. I didn’t think I was that cold hearted, but apparently a lack of empathy is one of my downfalls. When I sit & think about it, he’s probably right. I try to be upfront & to the point about things. I have a heart, but its hiding somewhere… (think of the Grinch’s heart). I can empathize for people, but I’m usually the one just trying to push people to suck it up & forge ahead. Now, I’m ok with having a man that has more empathy than me, but if he’s a whiny little sappy baby I’m gonna go fucking crazy!! o_0
One of Young’s most accomplished scores. The composer composed one of his most beautiful themes for this movie though this particular track only hints at this theme. Played entirely by strings it still has an emotional power even though there is no overt statement of the powerful theme.
In India, there are McAloo Tikki, vegetarian burger for Hindus and also, spicy food like McCurry Pan to suit the locals’ likings for spicy food in McDonald’s. There is also no Big Mac there as Hindus can not eat beef, so instead, McDonald’s have the Maharaja Mac, a burger look like Big Mac that is made up of chicken meat.
The lychee popping bubble. So good! Every time I would get a popping bubble, it felt like Christmas!
Meanwhile we are trying to sell our apartment!! Hopefully this will happen SOON! It means that we have to keep the place decluttered and CLEAN... mmm yes I best go do that again Now as we are having people through tomorrow - outside the normal Sat inspection time! Bye for now!!!
Today we went for the first drive.
When we’re not enjoying the refreshing water, Newport Beach is a great place to walk along the sand, play games, bask in the sun, and take in the Golden Coast. As I continue to walk along the boardwalk, revel in the sunsets, and boogie board in the ocean waves all year long, the beauty of Newport Beach never ceases to amaze me.
When you are out in front of the audience, your first responsibility is to be heard. The consequences of pushing your voice can be far reaching if you rely on your voice for your work. Voice training is invaluable to gain authority, confidence and gravitas when you are presenting. Have a look at the British Voice Association website for valuable tips on how to take care of your instrument.
Life changes for all sorts of reasons, mostly those which are totally out of our control. The famous John Lennon quote goes:
Benji goes down for a nap between 1-2 and I will send the boys in their room or outside to play.
-Don’t carry a flask in your hip pocket. It looks bad and is likely to be lost besides.
Cold kale in the kitchen garden
I remember when I first heard Amanda’s work, back in 2004. My best friend urged me to try a new band, pointing me to several demos available for free on their website. As she is seldom wrong about music, I strolled over to the site of a band called The Dresden Dolls and downloaded Girl Anachronism and Half Jack. Girl A. seemed like a cool title, so I spun it first.
1145 **D-IX/4/1992. “Machiavellianism and Christopher Marlowe’s The Jew of Malta.” The Jewish Question in Shakespeare and His Predecessors Panel (with Grant Mindle, Barbara Tovey, and Martin Yaffe), Claremont Institute for the Study of Statesmanship, Annual Convention, American Political Science Association, Palmer House, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2001(6), above, pp. 357-70.)
I still have a lot of the roster left to obtain but I have faith I can get close to finishing it this year. I'll keep everyone posted throughout the year. Tomorrow the Texans play the Ravens so I'll be pretty nervous over the next 24-36 hours.
I hope you've had a chance to play around in the Library of Congress's National Jukebox was recently launched on their website. It's an incredible catalog of old music, from a variety of genres, and could easily play as a soundtrack to many of the posts on this page.
Thank you, my dear husband, for not calling me crazy (even though I thought I must be crazy) when I first mentioned the idea of homeschooling 21 years ago. Thank you for supporting me when I was a working mother of one infant with one on the way and I was commuting 3 hours a day to my job as a Navy lieutenant in Washington, DC. I was always exhausted--emotionally and physically drained--but you never scolded me for a messy house or a lousy dinner (a most attractive feature which you display to this day). You always tell me how gorgeous I am, even when I don't feel gorgeous. You have always given me everything I ever desired. I could never have been a mom to ten or homeschooled for even one single day if it weren't for your great love and support. Thank you for being my helpmate and companion these past 25 years.
She told me about how she has a lady come in and clean twice a week so she can have time for herself. I thought about how I can't relate.
What they’ve done is terrible and shouldn’t be done ever again. But I do believe that all of them deserve a second chance. There is no doubt that I am angry with each of them. No one should ever be allowed to beat up another human being, let alone your romantic partner. Nobody should get away with racially abusing someone else, regardless of whether the whole world is watching or not. But we all make mistakes, small or big. Yes, Terry, Suarez and Brown should know that they shouldn’t have done what they have but the damage has been done. I just wish that they have learned from their experiences.
Full lips curved into a smile and a tongue slipped out to wet them. “I could probably arrange that, but you will resign yourself to me sweetheart. Eventually, but not this time,” he murmured wickedly.
AC: Where do you eat?
‘Betrayal’ is the first novel written by author Michele Kallio. It tells the story of two women, living centuries apart yet somehow connected.
And here they are.
Republicans do not put much stock in that argument. America is a free country they say, if a law-abiding American sitting at a bar wants to inhale some dried up leaves laced with chemicals or deliberately fart in a random patron’s face and stick him with a needle containing a slow-acting poison, then it is his God-given right to do so.
plants sweetly lining either side of a pea gravel path
...introducing Linda Spring! This is a fabulous collection featuring everyone's favorite girl teddy bear - Linda - and her favorite Spring things. And look at that wonderful freebie today - I know you can all find a creative way to use that daffodil!
What did I drink when watching this tosh? Two 275ml bottles of Carlsberg Export. Figure the units yourself.
The stamp is a single daisy head from Hobby Art, which I masked and multiple stamped. A touch of colour with ProMarkers and matted on a piece of soft green paper from Prima. A Hero Arts sentiment and a few pearls to finish off.
I had the laziest weekend ever. It was great on Friday, but by Sunday evening...when I realized that I still hadn't done anything productive all weekend...I was feeling awful. It seems like the less I do, the lazier I act. Like my laziness just feeds on itself.
Subliminal messages work the same way. They should begin with the word YOU rather than I. So the mind is essentially taking the 'you' statement as direction from the subconscious, because it is using the language of the subconscious.
So now, onto my album! I apologize for the terrible pictures. Daylight savings time is not my friend and I don't have a lightbox at the current moment.
Tina came from a much bigger city than I did, and her life seemed fascinating. She told me how her dad cracked codes during the Korean war, and as a result he hated the jumble puzzles in the newspaper. She told me about her crazy theater friends back home, and about being a Greek kid growing up in the Philadelphia area. Her roommate was a beautiful black-haired, pale girl from Bavaria. Tina spoke German to her and she'd reply in English, so they could each learn each other's languages. I remember around Christmas time, Tina and her friends showed up at my dorm, upset because some guy across the quad from their building had decorated his window with lights, and some douchebags had rearranged them to spell "fag." She made jokes about it, but it got to her, and I remember thinking that she had a real conscience, and she hated bullies.
It got harder by degrees. With subtractive art, there's no "undo." And no "redo." Once it's gone, it's gone. After a while, the choices got more challenging.
this Dangerous Game to forget my name has got me losing sleep.
That is first place.
Bake for 1 hour in the preheated oven, or until a toothpick inserted near the center comes out clean. Let stand 10 minutes, then remove from pan, and cool on a wire rack.
Some students even went into the ocean. All different types of activities were going on in the water. College-aged people were surfing, kayaking and just standing knee deep enjoying the beautiful day.
"Dinner in three minutes."
Prince Valtoris
Around the house... A beautiful vase of pink lilies that my hunny bought for me. So pretty and the fragrance is wonderful!
live on Golden Pond
In 2009 most engine manufacturers developed their own KERS system, while Williams were the sole team developing a system independently. Albeit not every team raced with KERS and some teams dropped KERS at various races. For 2010 FOTA agreed to drop KERS, albeit it was still legal with in the rules, as a cost cutting measure it was best not to run or develop KERS any further. Even within 2009 season KERS was not a huge success, the system had a FIA cap on the amount of energy that could be re-used, only 400kJ could be stored, which when used for 6.7s per lap, the car gained some 80hp. Thus although a 0.3s boost to laptimes, the system was ultimately limited in its potential to improve laptimes. Thus no team could create a competitive advantage from a more powerful system. Then the weight of the system created issues, At a time when the wider front slick tyres demanded an extreme weight distribution of up to 49% weight on the front axle, the 25+Kg of a KERS system mounted behind the CofG handicapped teams being able to push weight forwards. Most teams dropping or not racing their system cited weight as the main reason for its loss.
Galactica had a rather more brutally functionalist agenda. "Every woman adores a fascist / The boot in the face" as Sylvia Plath famously asserted. Perhaps one could rephrase that to say that the American system of governance has always had a sneaking sympathy for - and uncomfortable resemblance to - fascism: the insistence on social conformity, the profusion of emotive flag-waving and symbolic reenactments of nationhood ... Galactica was interesting because it examined such attitudes - at length, with pellucid, dispassionate logic - rather than simply embodying them (unlike Star Trek and its innumerable sequels).
Elvis Beer!!! Could anyone have imagined? I think my Mom and half a zillion people over the age 60 would buy a bottle of this just because it has Elvis on the label! Marketing genius? Well... Lisa Marie's lawyers will be all over this if hits the shelves. They're want their profit cut! Worse than that.... It's ESB! Maybe put a photo of the later Elvis, all fat and bloated, call it Elvis Sloppy Bastard. Maybe they should hook up with Samurai Artist and do a Peanut Butter and Banana Beer to commemorate Elvis....or just fill it with Amphetamines! Damn.... the man was a train wreck!
The cover is the bit on the outside of the book. That doesn't take much explanation. It can be a flimsy bit of card if you've written a mass-market paperback or a cloth binding covered by a glossy dust wrapper if you've written a high-end hardback - or anything in between.
The missing cat was taken in as a stray after being found sitting on a log in a forest near the village of Aying, by Kilian Schoettel, 19, the Muenchener Abendzeitung local daily reports.
If you're not stuffing this, form into two loaves and place them in a baking pan.
Yes Mr/Mrs. Anonymous, I am cut out for my job in a way you can never understand. I don't post about the hysterical mothers finding their dead children or when people scream about their houses being on fire.
I’m still not to my main point…
There comes a point in your life when you realize that letting go of someone is the best thing to do. After all of the pain, the angst, the hurt from the other person has torn you down enough, it's time to let go.
Europe photo diary?
1. When most of the water is at it’s lowest possible point in the bowl, pour in a large quantity of dish soap(the kind you use if you wash dishes by hand. Do not use dishwasher detergent, or laundry detergent).
According to a 2010 report by the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation, M-Kesho attracted 455,000 new account holders within its first three months, taking off at a faster rate than the M-Pesa service itself had in its earliest stages. In addition to providing a full virtual account managed from a user’s cell phone, M-Pesa offers the M-Kesho account holder the opportunity to take out a microloan after several months.
There are seventeen people standing for eleven places on Hay council - even though three of the present councillors are not standing again, so for the first time in several years there will be an actual contest for seats.
I told the couple about the word that just popped into my mind. When I spoke that word, ‘Uriah,’ the wife immediately dissolved into tears. ‘Oh Lord,’ she cried, ‘I knew that you were going to make me confess all of these sins.’ She went on to describe how she had been married previously. At work she fell in love with another man (her current husband) and colluded with that man to extricate her from her marriage to her first husband. Once the first husband was out of the way (divorced not murdered), the two now in front of me were free to become husband and wife. They confessed all sorts of other sins that they had committed. In short, they didn’t have a business problem – they had a sin problem!
If you’re not going to thoroughly research and honestly write on racial topics, stop writing about them! Leave the subject to the professionals. Like me.
Basically, as you can hopefully see from my card above, it's a card that has two interlocking flaps...one smaller than the other...that opens to reveal a hidden message or image.
...was the holiday season FLYING past.
Right outside of Corona is a lovely little shopping area called Dos Lagos (Two Lakes). I really like the way the shopping center is arranged with a "main street" and the lakes at the end. The lakes have a walkway between and around them.
“I came here to work to lighten my family’s burden. Now I just want my money and to go home,” she said.
* The nationalization of all the arms and explosives factories.
My little mans wittle tosies!! :) The family went out on a walk today and it was nice enough I was able to put G in shorts and flip flops! I just love his toes!!
Stoke still offered little in response and the match crawled into its final stages. Benayoun combined with van Persie around the Stoke area and as the Israeli ran into the area, contact was made by Whelan with Benayoun going to ground. A penalty? It probably would have drawn a free kick elsewhere which makes the decision not to award the spot kick baffling. That the contact was minimal and in fairness probably not enough to genuinely send Benayoun to ground makes it understandable. That is tempered by Foy not booking the Arsenal player; if he felt it was exaggerated, surely Benayoun was guilty of Ungentlemanly Conduct? OrSimulation. Don’t even go there with that one.
At a cost of £333, I think the seminar is well worth attending as it offers attendees a very good opportunity to learn to enter deep meditative states in a very short period of time; and to gain knowledge of a wide range of spiritual issues. The DVD and the manual provided to seminar attendees also enables them to repeat the meditations and initiations covered during the seminar, as often as needed, so that further spiritual development can be continued at their own pace.
As a proud Dick, I would like to express my disgust and outrage at the cheap joke made at the expense of Mr. Dick Pole, the pitching coach of the Chicago Reds. Although I’m English and don’t understand a thing about ‘pitching’ (it means something else here in North London and I could never see the need to coach teach what comes so naturally to young boys of a certain age), I’m certain that Dick Pole is good at his job and doesn’t deserve such ridicule. I am also sure that his friends and family would stand firmly beside Mr. Pole to show the world a united front against such cheap Dick shots.
In order to actually travel the path and journey towards redemption, understanding and enlightenment, you have to take personal control over your journey..it cannot be religious controlled..religon is fixed and full of demands, the essence of god and light is fluid, free infinite and all-encompassing (macro) as well as personal (micro). virtually all spiritual perception and awareness lies within the inner realms, and not outside in 3D bubble reality. Most religions focus on prayer to the heavens or other similar places and your outwardly deeds..very few concentrate on the inner self..”Pray, Pray, Pray..ask for forgiveness and Jesus, Buddha, Mohammed, or Allah will take care of you”..this is nonsense and will not enhance your spiritual Awareness one iota..you personally have to take responsiblity for your own inner spiritual journey and as you do so through Trance, meaningful prayer,and any other spiritual disciplines,you begin to access the inner knowledge that is available to us. Being able to see beyond the conventional and into the worlds beyond is where the path lies, the journey is two-fold, firstly it is being able to reach the inner path, then it is about travelling the path,..the travelling of the path is the true journey.
all come to mind. Submitting a four-page paper with math equations and graphs proving that your traffic violation was the result of the officer suffering from an optical illusion isn’t the strategy most people would employ. It worked, though.
Capable of living; especially: having attained such form and development as to be normally capable of surviving outside the mother’s womb.
And she felt pretty in her flimsy cotton dress, and her hair smelled of apples.
(My thanks go out to the folks who suggested I check out Jeff Wayne's War of the Worlds in the comments following that "Narration Metal" post the other day. You guys were right, this is some crazy shit.)
Food poisoning
Blend the oil and water and add lecithin. Continue blending until it resembles a soft margarine. Add some turmeric if you want to make it yellow.
2- Josh
Well, I told you I was going to hate this book. And, what do you know? I was right.
3 maintain
“I am Jesus whom thou persecutest. It is hard for thee to kick against the pricks.” (Acts 9:5)
You’ll have to forgive my controlling tendencies, I don’t have very much control over things in my life and when I have the opportunity to control something, I grab with both hands.
First I wanted to say I love your blog! You've given me so many ideas since I started following your adventures. I don't know how you manage to keep your house so organized with your busy life - but I am very impressed!
In this sense, both creatures suggest an alienation from our bodies. That's something I remember played up well in a sequence from the novelisation of Remembrance of the Daleks by Ben Aaronovitch, and it could be part of what makes Davros so compelling.
NVIC has been calling for basic science research into the biological mechanisms of vaccine injury and death for more than two decades. Without understanding how and why vaccines can cause brain and immune system dysfunction, there will be no way to develop pathological profiles to help scientifically confirm whether or not an individual has been injured or died from vaccination.
Yuan (Sunny) Yuan served as a Hubert Scholar in Public Service in Cambodia. The second she began to speak, her words shot out rapidly as she explained her various experiences almost too quickly for me to follow. She started off with a brief explanation of Cambodian history and the Khmer Rouge regime which occurred in between 1975 and 1979. Yuan first became interested in the cultural and political dealings of Cambodia after attending a lecture by Dr. Alan Lightman. She first traveled to Cambodia in the summer of 2010 where she was a part of the Alliance Association of Rural Restoration in the Pursat Province. She returned to Cambodia in the summer of 2011 as a Leadership Resident at the Harpswell Foundation. This group helped to build dorms for woman to live in and created classes in order to “empower a new generation of women leaders in Cambodia”.
Lionsgate make some cheap movies. That said, they had to know this was going big. Could have been a little over 3 hours and double the budget and they’d have made money. It needed it. It needed more immersion.
There is no suggestion that more food is being consumed… just that the latter generation’s diet consists of Fast Food that is Fat Enriched… and loaded with Salt … rather than Fresh Meat… Fruits… and Vegetables.
And yes, I do remember actually putting down the giraffe with the steaks. Why the hell did I do that?
The Upsetters - Dub So
- Toxic substances such as alcohol, cigarettes, white sugar and flour, sodas, artificial sweeteners and caffeine.
Additions such as WR Chaz Schillens, S LaRon Landry, WR Scotty McKnight, QB Tim Tebow and TE Hayden Smith highlight the Jets moves this offseason.
Over the years I’ve tried many recipes, ones online, ones friends gave me, but either I was off because I was missing an ingredient or 2 (and I have a lot of ingredients), or the recipe was long (and tedious). I want to have dinner done in an hour. I’ve also had friends suggest the pre-done packets but they are always too spicy for my kids to eat.
I made the flower, after watching a tutorial on you tube, and from some tissue type paper that was in a scruffy old book I picked up in a charity shop. The pages were rather lovely, handmade with flower petals in and this stuff between each page (white tho) but the fabric cover was patchy and faded. It only cost £1 and I have about 16 just bigger than A3 pages of each type. I can definately use them somehow, the tissue in flowers for sure.
I look at Greylands as a way to keep writing between projects. Eyeballs deep in BD&L, my brain couldn’t take launching into something that demanded a lot so it’s a way to exercise my writing muscles. I was originally going to grab one of the minor characters Krista had introduced. Instead, a character named Fletch demanded I carry his part of the tale. I never know where he’s going to lead me, but I definitely think he’s up to no good.
Does the Veggie Kugel frighten you? It should, because it’s damn tasty. Click on the “Read the rest of this entry” link below for more.
I have a father, I don’t know, and I have a Dad that raised me. These are physically two different men. A choice my mother made.
Acts 17 gives us insight into Paul’s missionary strategy. As he passes through Thessalonica, Paul goes to the local synagogue for three consecutive Sabbaths to preach Jesus as the Messiah. “He reasoned with them from the Scriptures, explaining and proving that the Christ had to suffer and rise from the dead.” Paul understands that these Jews have a context for understanding Jesus through the Hebrew Scriptures (or, Old Testament, as we call it). Paul’s evangelistic appeal to them is rooted in Scripture.
Now if nothing good happens and it is a rut, yes I hate that situation, the job may be part of that and if so then I need to leave the job or modify the situation somehow.
However the way I will show you is one used in East Africa so if you are familiar with a different method, I apologize- this is how I was taught! And, I must say, it makes a mean chapati.
Now that Matt’s found an
On May Day 2010, he expropriated four power-generating companies.
All day I sat looking out of the window at swirling snow. At times it looked like we were in some huge snow globe. Most of the time the flakes appeared to be heading upwards. I feared that driving home could be a problem but with this being the soft, southern side of Manchester, none of it stuck. It wasn't until I got back to the frozen north that the roads became perilous.
Hi there, readers!
Around the time that our second daughter was born, Matt started getting some work again. Not super steady, but work nonetheless. Life was still very tough and by the end of the year we were relying on Christmas and birthday money.
I love it that age has enabled me to give up most of my idolization of women. I love it that Peggy stayed with me during all the years before this was true.
Did the CAFC blow an opportunity to clarify 35 U.S.C. §101? Probably, but you can't really blame the court, given the circumstances of the case.
Air-conditioned Paper Mario
As we walked along the promenade, we had seen another sort of train, one with tyres and no rails. For some reason it’s called “Boat Train” and it carries passengers along the promenade.
We are often told that a certain thing has to happen in the national interest we need to make cuts to reduce our deficit in the national interest is one notable one. But what is this so called national interest?
Mercedes were one of the many teams to switch to pull rod suspension for 2011, to gain the aero benefits and a lower CofG. With space at a premium at the back of an F1 car, compromises in packaging the various suspension elements need to be made. At its launch it was clear the Mercedes pull rod arrangement placed the rocker quite rearward, in comparison to other pull rod arrangements which place the rocker towards the front of the gear case. The conventional forward rocker placement, puts the heave spring and antiroll in the space at the front of the gear case, packaged around the clutch.
Old Town San Diego State Historic Park is the “Birthplace of California.” SD is the birthplace of California! Sweet!!I’ve been to Old Town San Diego many times over the years, my first time was when I was a wee lad in elementary school…but sadly, I have only been to Old Town 3 times over the years for the purpose of photographing this historic area.
We ended up crossing 6 lanes of non stop traffic to go to another pagoda across the road. One gate was open but all the doors to the pagoda were locked and no one else was there. We walked around for a little bit, then someone who was watering the plants yelled at us because apparently we weren’t supposed to be there.
de este mal no muere nadie!
each other to the death."
A parting shot. As long as I subjected myself to the constant indoctrination of my first wife God could never get the truth in to my head. There were countless times I had real strong questions and doubts. But each time I went to talk to her about them I was beaten down and threatened with my salvation if I disagreed with her. She would get angry and I feared her anger. I was used to doing what she said so I did not get chastised. I could see the obvious actions which would prove to any rational person that she was either evil or insane. But I did not act upon rational ideas. I acted on faith and love and a desire to always be with her. I acted on fear of punishment and desire for approval.
Fits UK4-8
After SIL#3 picked Kara up I headed to the quilt shop to purchase the additional Christmas fabric I need for our girls weekend retreat. Surprise, surprise I couldn't leave without something extra, Sweetwater Reunion fabric.
Five beers rather than the usual four (and full glass servings as well) meant that all were soon well refreshed and listening intently. That so many present were still recovering from Saturdays GABS SpecTAPular may have had something to do with the subdued nature of the mob. It’s not often you get people nodding off during Ale Stars and I will keep my promise to Tony and not mention anyone by name. There you go, Tony.
2. Hana Center, which is affiliated with the official relocation centers for defectors, also accepts volunteers. I'm personally acquainted with Jordan Groh, who works with one of the four centers in Seoul. You can email him (username jordan.groh at the famous Google mail server) for more information.
3rd is the empty spot where the gazebo was.
And don’t be afraid of the dark.
While Fi and I have many similar interests (like movies, reading, cooking, family, being outdoors, Judaism, our dog etc) nothing seemed fitting for a wedding. However, I wanted our wedding to be romantic and I love love love linked hearts. They're romantic, cute and best of all they represent the two of us coming together. I honestly feel as though my heart is linked to his. And just so you know, I felt like a dork typing that.
The two eventually realize they are not alone in the city. The Elder Things missing from Lake’s camp had somehow returned to life and, after slaughtering the explorers, returned to the city of their origin. Dyer and Danforth discover traces of the Elder Things’ earlier exploration, as well as sledges containing the corpses of Gedney and the dog missing from the camp.
Now, after 6 years of working in the Corporate world, he has decided to come back out to not only serve the society again but to share the knowledge, values, and expertise that he learned and mastered in the fields of Corporate, Communications, and Professional Excellence training. The world will have a chance, once again, to hear it from the early mid-2000′s premier youth leader and academic excellence guru and learn the following from him:
Red sleeveless floor-length prom dress, handmade by my grandmother. Roomy bust has hidden pouches for which to stuff tissue.
2nd Mini-Metamorphosis: Pottery Barn Knock-0ff, Shell Chargers:
You know what, I’m proud of the men and women who have pulled up their socks, put in the extra hours, and did what they had to do to financially support their loved ones. I’m proud of those who have accepted – not settled with, but ACCEPTED – a job that they may not enjoy as much as another, simply because they are trying to make ends meet and cannot financially afford the alternative.
I wanted beer and The Craft Beer Co, in Clerkenwell, as my first port of call in my mini London pub tour was going to provide it.. Much has been written about it (Mr Dredge , Mr Tandleman and Mr Ghost Drinker cover it well) since it opened a couple of months ago. It's the sister pub of the Cask Pub and Kitchen in Pimlico and in it's short time trading, Craft Beer Co has managed to attract a keen following drawn to it's huge and eclectic collection of home grown and international cask and keg beer.
On the appointed day, she was knocking on this door and that, and when she went in the stairwell to climb up another flight, she was surprised to find, Scotch-taped to each step, a penny!
Then ended with
A display is an eye-catching arrangement that presents information about a topic in a visual way. I think of a display as a collection of items that, together, as well as individually, will help me teach a principle or reinforce the monthly theme. I assign an appropriate review song for each item in the display and the principles taught in the songs also reinforce the principle. I usually use objects in a display, but sometimes I include pictures, as well.
Having no agenda
½ cup nuts toasted and chopped (optional)
Sage Cardstock
* head pains and pressures radiating down into the temples and side jaw area
my mind flashes through this scenario and I shudder. I’m thanking God. I’m grabbing Sadie. I’m gathering my family. Rob, the soldier who sat behind me, is helping us out onto the wing. This is now. This is my reality.
With the rainy weather, and the ugly damp, I stayed in most of the week. With nothing better to do, I decided to make some cookies. You've maybe noticed that I've been in a cookie funk. I have been making many cakes, but the last time I made a decorated cookie was, Oh right, just before my anniversary, so mid February. That is a long time to have waited to make cookies. I decided to make up my own reality, whereby the rain from outside instantly cleared up and the flower started to bloom!
“Then let me tell you what we do,” Tomas said.
Ummm, Lexi's teeth will hopefully all move and line up nicely. If not, I'll have to take her on the road as "The Amazing Shark Girl" because Savannah already used all our orthodontic insurance.
The hat suits Bear, blocking relaxed it slightly, so it is a little looser than before, and longer, which provides a tiny turn up. Bear is old school in many things, so beanie hats have turn ups, they are not slouchy, even if other guys wear then a little slouchy. Still this hat provides Bear with options, even if he doesn't take advantage of them.
flatbacked pearls
This is a fun bright card for the beginning of Spring. Pull out some bright colors and join us with our sketch challenge. Now it is time to head on over to Sharon Wheet's blog to see what she did with the sketch this week.
that should do the trick, our vet told us.
~ “Magick” and “Wicca” as religious systems in modern society
I spent all week working on reports. Two of the impact evaluation reports are due tomorrow, including one covering four bridges. Since I'm leaving tomorrow for the Texas Archaeological Society annual meeting in Lubbock, it meant they were due today.
They come from Alaska, but lived in Finland for many years. They welcomed us to their house and gave us coffee and soup. It was a good way to pass a Sunday afternoon.
"I'm lucky I have you for my mommy," she said. I wanted to soak in this compliment, but right then, I felt like I had let her down even if she didn't realize it. I want to deserve my daughter's pride in me.
Jose Torres-Tama refers to himself as a “brujo performance artist” with shows that are a fusion of spoken word, fire rituals, spectacle, poetry recitation and more. He’s based in New Orleans and his current show is called Cone of Uncertainty, New Orleans after Katrina. He was there during the hurricane and its aftermath and you can download his essays about the experience here. This story originally appeared in Red Hours of Damage Inside Nocturnal New Orleans. I found it on the 3AM site. It’s a dysfunctional Latino love story told in a series of vignettes that drive us to the final, heated climax of the protagonists’ relationship.
The band, which is currently comprised of drummer Phil Ehart, bassist Billy Greer, violinist David Ragsdale, singer/keyboardist Steve Walsh, and guitarist Richard Williams, will continue their ‘Collegiate Symphony Tour’ through the spring of 2012 and will headline a package tour with the band Kings X in the fall of 2012.
Have a wonderful Wednesday!
now that i'm alone
The new version is LIVE! It’s very pretty, user friendly, and they really responded well to user feedback. I’ve only just dipped my toe in, but I’m really happy with the changes they’ve made. If you’re reaching for any goal, not just overcoming an injury or illness, I strongly encourage you to take a look at SuperBetter as a way to help you write the map to success.
First, off to the Bath Haus of Gaga to talk about spectacle and the gaze. The opening of Lady Gaga's video, set up like a painting, like portraiture, lets me know that this video will be all about looking, being looked at, and the self's capacity to imagine all the angles of that looking. Lady Gaga will be the center of it all, the hinge for the action upon which all gazes converge. In the opening tableau, Gaga is enthroned with her entourage and her posh accoutrements (Zikmu Parrot by Starck $1600 wireless speakers product placement), revealing that fame has placed her into a rareified position, and the spectacle of her fashion positions her as well aware (razor-blade spectacles as razor-sharp vision; outfit that looks reptilian and tough yet gilded, armor-like). This image is much like an album cover and the stasis it implies, but once the video becomes dynamic, this (self-)image starts to morph.
-The pundits at MSNBC don't want Guiliani to win for some reason that I haven't yet figured out. I'll bet his poll numbers don't take a hit after this debate, though, which tells me the rest of those paying attention don't share their reasoning.
· Ben E. King
2) Fix my finances. A big goal and an important one to my mental well being.
We last left you intently watching for Apple’s earnings and comments from the 2 day FOMC meeting. April is an intensely busy month for us here at Blackthorn as the Tax Man creates much consternation and money movement amongst our clientele. We have spent the past two days helping clients out of jams and delivering time sensitive information. We left you in good hands as we knew there was not much to be said until after Bernanke had his say and Apple reported their latest blowout numbers. Well here we are. Now what say you?
To find the truth, I exhaustively researched the facts of the matter, which as you know means I Googled the phrases "effects of beer after running" and "is beer good for you after a run" and spent five minutes looking to see what turned up.
We can’t fix the corruption, we can’t establish a strong central government, we can’t fix the ethnic and tribal rivalries and feuds. The Afghans have not proven themselves deserving of the investment in lives and treasure we have already expended for them, let alone more.
I was doing a little prep today so I will have things to eat tomorrow so here’s my first recipe:
NCIS: - Tony acting like a frat boy. Again? Can't we move forward here? This is one of their worst seasons. It seems they have run out of ideas and the characters are fading. Jamie Lee Curtis and Gibbs? Yeah, ok. He probably needs to be getting some horizontal action but she is more interesting eating her poop-inducing yogurt. We need more Abby. How about some McGee? Or Ziva without the face-hurting pulled-back hair? Ugh. I think I slept through last week's episode.
What I noticed was that sometimes students' stamina in practicing these words waned, especially with our 25 minute session length. Also, we don't have spelling words every week (short weeks, in particular), but we do Daily 5 every day, so what were we to do?
I suppose this is true of anything that we recall from our earliest years. Everything that we can remember, period, is of some importance to us, because those things that we recall all occurred in moments when we were totally present, which is why they made an impression in the first place. Times when we were in the Now, totally captured by the experience. Childhood memories especially mark experiences that marked us at that time. These also include positive memories of course, a parent’s smile, being tossed in the air, a game, childhood events, whatever it is we remember is something that, for us at that time, totally engaged our attention. Perhaps I and others like me who had the help of open-minded parents and relatively free surroundings can thank the mass media for a bit of help back then, if not that, then, at least, some weird memories and fine entertainment.
I read the opening scene provided in the adventure, then reminded the party of the captured prisoner from the last encounter. They questioned him a bit, and learned the name of the lord, and his 2 siblings who each vied for the hidden chambers. They deduced much of this through skill checks. One player was particularly interested in the scorpions and how they got down here. He learned that the thugs came through the tunnel but the scorpions were kept below. It became somewhat relevant later on. The thug offered to lead them to Downshadow.
But in taking risks, leaders do everything, legally, ethically and morally correct in every aspect of their lives, both professionally and personally.
My usual perception of street and bus performers are people with strong needs for money. In Montevideo I was very surprised to see lots of street singers and performers that, from their appearance, seemed to be average people doing it just for fun. And they were really good!
So I was bottling my Red Ale this evening (should turn out pretty well. I'm excited for it to carb up) and had a new first. I really never thought I'd see this. As I was capping one of the final bottles, the "Big Red Capper" decided that bottle wasn't good enough and sheared the top of it right off.
How many more 'unexpected' record lows are to come?
Farmer’s decision to leave the four-person scrutiny panel, which includes two employers’ occupational health experts and the new president of the British Medical Association, is backed by Richard Hawkes, chief executive of the disability charity Scope. “We share Mind’s concerns about the work capability assessment,” he says. “The huge number of successful appeals are a damning indictment of a test that isn’t fit for purpose. There’s little point in scrutiny if the government doesn’t listen to it.”
I dreamt of the places we’d go to
It was a quick read, and with very few surprises. The differences between the book and the many characterizations and movies is subtle. For example I think Alice comes across as less impertinent that in most characterizations, and more like a normal young girl who is not afraid to speak her mind. One of the more interesting points is the assertion in the forward declaring Alice is just a fun story with no intent to have high morals; it is meant as purely entertainment. Further the claim is there are plenty of other methods of providing moral teaching in this age (when the book was written) so there is no need to impart any morality training in this story, it is simply meant to be a fun imaginative romp.
I have been pondering the path that we take in our lives.
sport: spring season lacrosse clinic (not a travel team),
The other scary part is that Iran has set in motion events that Saudi Arabia is unlikely to ignore, and even if Saudi Arabia is restrained by its global allies, Iran - which has seriously lost face over its botched assassination attempt - may plot more seriously to escalate tensions. And that would really spook world markets, jack up the price of oil, severely impact global GDP growth, and perhaps even result in unmanageable inflation because oil is a vital raw material that drives prices on all manner of consumer and non-consumer goods.
Last week I was asked by a friend and fellow photographer, Laura Evans to do a guest post on "inspiration" on her blog while she is away in France...
authorities.
I will start this review by making a disclaimer: I have not ‘finished’ Skyrim in the tradtional sense. Normally I will only review a game once I have finished it, in the interests of fairness.
Morning came too soon
My IKEA plan of attack always begins in the clearance section. Cause really what's the point of walking thru the whole store when what I'm looking for might be right there? So, I went in. Saw it. Claimed it. It's mine.
Don't you love to see the pictures of row after row of gorgeous lavender?
The only thing it doesn't take care of is the kitchen clean-up part....
PAXMAN: scone scones?
Despite my poor English, Don and I became good friends going for walks and looking at wild plants. I was 14 years old.
The “harrowing” cases in the report disclose:
“Please could All Towns advise me of any sewage and/ or mining contamination that is taking place in or near their Town, together with photos and water tests where possible, copies of criminal charges that have been made, etc. that is affecting our Rivers and Dams.
I put this here without comment, other than I know you're judging and thinking it's disgusting and you'd never do it and then in a moment of desperation when you can't get the gunk out of your baby's nose and she's miserable and you're miserable and the damn hospital bulb everyone told you to steal won't fit in her tiny nostril and she is acting like you're actually trying to murder her, you remember this and you order it and you now know the amazingness that is....the Nosefrida.
my people will receive a double portion,
Please let me know what you think.
The other day your sister was preparing an omelet for her dinner. This wasn't just a plain old egg omelet, but one with red peppers, onions, and bacon. Of course, after a few chops, the onion began stinging her eyes. Quickly she disappeared into the garage and rounded up the swim goggles. Problem solved.
I decided to use the Live Colour as I'd heard they were one of the best ones and choose this colour as i wanted it to be nice and bright.
Much of the legend which surrounds Edward Foster derives from his longevity. His claims of a great age can be traced somewhat earlier than the 1862 article, with his stated ages in the 1851 and 1861 Census records being 90 and 99 respectively. Reports in The York Herald (27 April 1861) and The Hull Packet (3 May 1861) also gave his age as 99 years. Unfortunately, I've as yet been unable to locate him in the 1841 Census.
An hour or more into our visit, Levon finally sat down at the kitchen table. This was obviously a meeting place for all who visited his home, as there were few other obvious locales to sit down and chat. Levon, Joe and Steve joined me at the table, and Levon reached into a bowl and pulled out a stinky bud of weed and began breaking it down and rolling it up. Clearly, I thought, this was a habit that had not died with his cancer battle. I thought "This probably helped him through those 29 chemo therapies he'd gone through." So I felt it was an honor to smoke the ganja with Levon. But the weed was so extraordinary in quality, it began affecting my mood, and I began to regret smoking it after a while.
man while drunk.
PS. Check out Aster's astounding seed bead work while you're there, or over here; she was resonsible for the beautiful turquoise necklace on the cover of the July 2011 Beads & Beyond.
The proposals also caused Boris Johnson to go to Brussels to try lobby against this directive, without of course realising that his own MEPs had voted in favour of it at the first reading in the European Parliament which is the only chance a proposal can be thrown out.
06. Psychedelic Mindfuck
Could not chase the red river away.
(1) What Stephen’s sacrifice “really” was and “really” meant are questions, respectively, for the historian and the theologian. We are not concerned with these questions because our attention is focused on the means through which all of this comes to us: a composition in which the normal literary processes of selection, emphasis, wording, and organization operate, and which must be studied as a literary composition.
And with its stamped command/message/motto, it seemed almost too adamant for a pendant. Then I had the idea of suspending it from a ribbon and turning it into a 'medal'. Yes!
The Witness was also sent a photograph of NPC 3260, a grey Toyota Corolla, late last week and yesterday received an e-mail showing a car bearing NPC 3228 plates.
Preheat your oven to 350 degrees. Grease your mini loaf pan. Sift your flour, baking powder, and salt into a bowl. In a separate bowl, mix together the yogurt, 1 cup of sugar, eggs, lemon zest, vanilla, and oil. Gradually add the flour mixture to this wet mixture, and then mix in the fruit. If you're concerned about your fruit being untidy and discoloring the batter, you can always mix it with a little flour before folding it carefully into the batter.
The weather wasn’t sunny, but wasn’t rainy either. Good enough for dinner, talk, some close drying, and foot massage. This time around no one wanted to scale that peak next to the campground. For some reason it became very cold that night. Usually, it wasn’t very cold so far this trip. But his particular night it was. Well, I suppose some peculiarities of the Arctic weather.
by words which dreamed
If your copy is 'clean' - and it should be - it will need little editing before it can be published. This doesn't mean that it's not covered in coffee stains and cat hairs, although it did also mean that in the days when you sent in a wodge of typewritten pages. It means that your copy is not peppered with grammatical mistakes and spelling errors, it hangs together properly and does what it says on the tin. Doing what it says on the tin is important. If you are supposed to submit a 500-word biography of a classical composer and you send 800 words that are mostly a critique of his music, you have done the wrong thing and can't expect the editor to be pleased - nor even to publish the work you have laboured over for so long. If your outline promised a 40,000-word novel for 10-year-olds, but you actually send 40,000 words written in language accessible only to a 13-year-old then again this is not what it said on the tin and you will be in trouble.
I could not have cast a spell
4 out of 5 – Violence – Ratlike monsters and gigantic grasshoppers appear in the book. Fone B., Thorn, and Gran’ma Ben all fend off against a horde of rat monsters, and Gran’ma is actually left to brawl the beasts herself. Fone gets his head slammed into a rat monster by Thorn, and a dragon casually breathes a whoosh of fire onto Fone, charring his head.
For the decoction, boil 1-2 teaspoons in a cup of water and take three times a day. The liquid extract should be taken in a 1:1 solution of 60% alcohol at .6-1.2 ml three times a day. Tinctures in a 1:5 solution of 60% alcohol, with 1-4 ml of the cotyledons three times a day.
It is ironic that it is to the greatest colonial parasite state that we must look for solutions to our own ills. In Israel, the drive for ethnic purity has now reached the point that ex-soldiers are being trained to do jobs which non-Jews would normally do. There are now Israeli Sushi Chefs, replacing Japanese chefs in an attempt to keep Israel for the Jews. In the UK, it is possible to get an entry visa as a curry chef, due to it being seen as essential that the food sold in restaurants is authentic. Thus you will not find an English chef in a Chinese restaurant, although it would be classed as racial discrimination to stop a non-indigenous chef getting the top job in an English restaurant.
It has dawned on me that his life may always be this way. Some people just lead dramatic lives, and don’t know how to change that. In fact, they may not even want to. I am pretty sure no one does anything without a reason, even if they don’t realize what that might be. Dramatic people may actually crave the adrenalin rush of pulling something off at the last minute.
The story of the first Christmas (retold from Luke 2:1-20),
It means developing multiple streams of income from one massive network marketing funnel so you get paid for the work you’ve done once and it’s duplicated over and over simply through a process of marketing. In order to be able to do that you have to understand the basics of Network Marketing.
There are many such shops on the path of metaphysical philosophy. Places that offer lots of gifts. A spiritual path full of lovely colors, sights and sounds that connect me with Spirit. Practices that let me get actively involved with understanding my purpose on a deeply personal level. My gratitude for Divine Spirit having led me to this path increases every day. My gratitude too for the wonderful, world wide web . . . for bringing me all this lovely knowledge.
Feels good to touch the sand, and feel it on my feet. Kinda forgot how it felt like already. :S
The most interesting information contained in this report is summarized in Vol. 1, Table 3.1, page 3.9, “Examples Of Environmental Media Activities Excluded From The Base Case”. A whole series of locations are listed for which “no feasible remediation approach is available” or for which “no feasible remedy without causing collateral ecological damage” are available. These include the Columbia River and the Hanford Reach at Hanford, White Oak Creek and other locations at Oak Ridge including the “deep hydrofracture grout sheet”, Savannah River Plant lakes, swamps and ponds, the Great Miami River at the Fernald, Ohio plant, the Snake River plain aquifer at INEL, assorted Rocky Flats sites, the underground test areas at the Nevada test site, and the chemical waste landfill ground water at the Sandia National Laboratory, New Mexico.
I get the number of her specialist and fire off a rocket. I call the nurses and leave a roaring message. Within 5 minutes the nurse calls and I get her to call my Mom. And an hour later she's in hospital. Turns out her heart is ok, thank God. But she has a severe bacterial infection all the way from her mouth to her gut. And her wound from surgery is not so hot either.
For passion like that (and for a business plan so compelling it’s been lauded in social entrepreneurship competitions from Harvard to University of Washington — and now onto Berkeley!) my $100 today is going to Malo Traders.
If you do not like coconut, try these anyway. My neighbors do not like coconut but they loved these!!
However, the subject of the show is what I found ultimately the most fascinating. Think about it, a show that invites six contemporary artists to curate their influences into a space after artist biography and discussion of influences and inspiration has been on decline in art historical and critical writing for the last thirty years. At a moment where art schools still offer (at least ten years past its prime) The Death of Author as a text as canonical as a contemporary art Iliad, the Hammer museum gives us an unashamed look at inspiration and how artists form themselves and their work. When the Getty Research Institute puts out a book of essays entitled The Life and the Work, a clumsy attempt to encapsulate the hornet’s nest of controversy over art and biography, Garrells gives us a show about the personal relationship between an artist’s work with history and those works which came before it. In a time of critical detachment and the ongoing attempts to put as many catchphrases and slogans between us and artwork, here’s a little humanity.
ISBN-13: 978-1451606805
At this moment, I am tucked up in bed with my Cats, May's copy of Company, Hall's Cherry flavoured throat sweets (my favourite) and a hot cup of tea. Yesterday I wasn't feeling too well, I had a headache and sore throat which I thought would go away, but has just got worse! So I'm treating myself to one lazy day off school as that is all I can afford with all my exams coming up!
"Any person who buys stolen goods is as guilty as the person who stole the goods, and harsher sentences will apply to both the buyer and the thief," he said.
The Tulsa Race Riot was also significant because it represented white backlash against Blacks who were attempting to enjoy the promises of capitalism and democracy with their own communities and their own commerce.
"Junior played for 20 years. That's five concussions a game, easily. How many in his career then? That's over 1,500 concussions. I know that's startling, but I know it's true. I had over 1,000 in my 15 years. I felt the effects of it. I felt depression going on throughout my divorce. Junior went through it with his divorce."
Sherri was just subpar for HER standards, and I dont think she excelled in a dance that was dark and brooding. Roshon probably doesnt have many FANS who watch this show. Even my grandmother isnt voting for him, so I think he could be doomed by the demographic.
It is close to impossible to get a picture depicting the engraving. This is the trophy for The Santa Anita Handicap. Darn, if I'd seen it first thing in the morning, I would not have made any purchases. But, I had to have it, since my Grandfather created this race. It is also called the "Big Cap" or the "Hundred Grander." 73 Handicap trophies have been awarded, so I called Mary Saenz, who has been with Santa Anita for over 40 years, to discuss my coup. The dealer was told that the cup was purchased from a Getty estate. The only Getty to win the Handicap has been Jacqueline Getty Phillips, with Bates Motel in 1983.
No bands can match this
Today, I was using Word. A good, familiar word processing program. I was was cutting and pasting from one document to another, when whoosh, my bolded section (the whole page) was deleted when I inexplicably hit delete by accident. Holy shit. Rush to the "undo" feature and re-wooshed it back into existence. There are so many things wrong with this scenario, I can hardly begin to list them all.
A recent archaeology excavation at Gor Khatri has established the city’s historical profile and now Peshawar is officially claimed by Archaeology Department to be the ‘Oldest Living City’ in South Asia, boasting a recorded history that goes back as far as at least 539 BC.
mp3 82 MB
Ok, so there is A LOT more that I took away from that service than that joke. I've gotten into the habit of taking notes during service and it really helps me to remember key points that stuck out for me, or be able to reflect on them later. Too often I just sit there thinking how the message applies to someone else I know, and I'm determined to break free from that because it's NOT helping me grow at all.
Unfortunately we have seen a substantial drop in rental rate since 2008 and the overall average asking rate is around $5.60/sf/yr. Downtown rates are under $4/sf/yr which is substantially lower than the north I-25 rates of $6.33/sf/yr.
Flash! Grandchildren born with health issues
20th); 2011 In Compliance 13th; Vic Venturi (BD 2nd)
Holmes and I were in Kansas City many years ago, he on business, and me visiting family. He had an afternoon off so we went to the Nelson-Atkins Art Museum. Before we got to the amazing antique furniture or the impressionist collection, which is unfortunately within sight of the Kandinsky, we found ourselves alone in a room with an antique green vase. It clearly hadn’t been dusted once since its creation.
If you are hard up for help, you could try this paying site – 10 Day Book Club
Vogue is not the only culprit that has this kind of blind sightedness in the way they misrepresent or under represent women of an ethnic background other than white Caucasian. Elle's December edition featured a "Model Power List" of the faces of 2010. Of the twenty almost exclusively white models who made the list Naomi Campbell was the only non-white model featured. Not a single Asian model was selected. With the variety of ethnic backgrounds of models working out there now the inclusion of Naomi Campbell, who as a supermodel was also a statistical rarity, seems nothing more than a token gesture on the part of Elle. No mention of Alex Wek or Jourdan Dunn, and fresh faced newcomers were abundantly represented so as long as they were white. In this day and age this seems crazy.
Chris, get some tight jeans, Tic-Tacs, and start slapping on eye-watering amounts of that Brut cologne you got for Christmas.
I see love (I see love)
Now you can guess how disappointed I am. Anyway, the old lady told me that this plant is no longer found in Singapore (yes, blame it on urbanisation). She got her source from Malaysia and it is expensive.
I am standing in my kitchen, eating an orange,
Floam. Amy from Nail-Venturous has taken the polish world by storm with her recent creations, namely Floam - which became an overnight hit not only amongst nail polish bloggers and collectors, but also in the mainstream market.
Yesterday, my royalty statement arrived relating to the first 6 months of this year. Sadly, it showed the chasm that still exists between my original advance and the money made from sales so far (an author doesn't receive royalty payments or income from translation rights etc until the advance has been used up).
"10 Best" in Santa Monica Contest
“To understand Occupy, you must get one thing. The Occupy Movement is as much about education and information sharing as it is about protest. The purpose of the camps, are to act as villages. They bring people together to share a space, food, ideas and build the personal relationships that galvanise a movement. There is also a massive support structure behind that of social media, direct action and organisational capabilities able to manifest ideas generated
Sometimes, that lesson is more important than any content contained within the covers of a textbook.
In addition to that I am always broke, or have been for the last few years, and so I never CAN buy stuff. So I just sit there and feel like a cheap idiot while everybody passes around gifts. I should know the drill by now but still- I never figure out anything clever or cute and creative.
Yeah…sure. But, what THE HELL just happened? I believe my Mound of Venus has been RIPPED OFF. And maybe my Vagina, too. Is it still there? I look. I think it is. Still there. Gulp. Gulp. Trying not to cry… I smile back at her through clenched teeth. Can she tell I’m faking the smile? Would another woman NOT EXPECTING this much PAIN have BITCH SLAPPED her? But, I can’t do that.... Damn! I'm a nice middle-aged suburban woman. I’m a mother for God’s sake! I stay SILENT. We talk of other things. Anything. Best NOT to focus on the PAIN. Or… to look down. I flip over onto my stomach. Dear God. Let my ass be hairless. It seems the worst is over. Phwwwooooo...We finish. Amazingly my panties still seem to be on. I thought they had been shredded. No blood? No evidence of the carnage? I'm shocked.
About 10 mint leaves, chopped
Here's the new twins of the family!!! :)
“I wish you would stop sneaking around like that, I had no idea you were here.” He turned to face the figure coming out of the alcove where the more priceless volumes of his extensive and rather ancient manuscript collection were kept. A figure of beauty, he noted, a pleasant vision. Even its walk was an elegant and seemingly effortless exercise of grace in motion. Zero smiled.
Hi everyone!! I am back! At last ;)
You see, back when I was looking for fabric for my Lady Grey coat, it was challenging to find coating in orange. Usually, the only time of year that you can find orange fabric is the two weeks before Halloween. And then it's usually covered in bats or black cats. So, I was thrilled when it seemed like a mini-trend for orange was happening last spring and I gleefully started to stash it away in preparation for the inevitable orange famine to come when bats and black cats would be back.
81) would you go on a date with me sometime?
Note: I listed some of the totals as what they will be, so if the next book in the series is being released later this year I still counted it, even if it hasn't been published yet.
As he reached the front door and opened to leave, he heard her call out from behind, “Never. You’ll never have me.”
“The company took 6,000 acres of agricultural land from us. We were told that our children would get good education for free. We were also promised quality healthcare and jobs. It even promised to build good schools in our villages. We were happy,” says Tripathi.
Do you Pursuit freedom in your life?
King: So, we meet again. You have been caught in the act, my dear. What have you got to say for yourself? Your sister already shamed your family, and here you are committing the same offense.
Location: Plus One Foundation – we do not have a formal office space but we meet at local businesses
A. Denies There Will Be A Literal, Bodily, Personal Return Of Christ To The Earth
Murder is No Mitzvah, edited by Abigail Browning
One time I was lost in the wood. I had lost the path, and had no idea where I was. Terror overtook me. I wandered around in the bush and prayed and cried, and there, right in front of me- the biggest chanterelle-place I ever saw. Terror disappeared, I picked and picked and filled up my shirt.
See, Ms. Balaskas gives you a whole lot of ammo to make sure you’re fully comfortable with hospital policies regarding waterbirth. I’m totally going to rock our class (coming up in June).
Niall MacPherson proves prescient:
These "artificial ice climbing structures... support natural ice where the air temperature is below freezing point." However, "permanent indoor structures," given "a temperature controlled environment," can also be created. These are described as "self generating real ice structures that utilize a liquid nitrogen refrigeration system."
Second person narratives are different in that they tell the reader directly how to feel. The Night Circus by Erin Morgenstern is a fantastic book that showcases the strength of second person, and I highly recommend (as I have on my own blog) that you get your hands upon it if you want to see how second person works, and also if you want a fantastic book.
November 13
Developer Kim Streich (the guy behind the amazing jailbreak app 3G Unrestrictor) explains:
2 c panko bread crumbs
Also hubby bought me a NEW CELL PHONE! A big deal for me. Mine was ancient.
Mr Todd, who had been tipped to succeed Sir Ian Blair at the Metropolitan Police as Britain's highest-ranking officer, is believed to have sent worrying text messages on Monday afternoon, prompting a search.
It seems like it's been forever since I had one.
Here are a few tips to quickly get the historical information needed about a content component, topic, or document:
Today’s blog is a message for ‘managers’ and ‘leaders’. Some of your rules are stupid! They are causing frustrating interactions for your customers. Some of the rules you have put in place are broken! Your job as a manager is to remove obstacles and barriers for your team.
Well, now I know it was a Thursday night that I did the vampire entry as I'm watching The Vampire Diaries as I type this. I am finally feeling a bit better. Steve thought it was something he ate at Bella Notte that made him so sick. I think it was the sliced ham we bought as I've spent the last couple of days dealing with the same symptoms. Yuck!! All that sounds good right now is Fresca. Stomach cramps woke me at 5 a.m. so I slept for quite awhile this afternoon. I was running a fever and exhausted - talk about weird dreams!!
The geriatric “cocoon” glasses which will make me look like…well…an extra in Cocoon.
How about a light shade of gray (picking up some of the light tones in the roof)
Once we finally got there, it was pretty fun, though you must be one who counts sitting on your husband's non-cheerleader shoulders in a cloud of smoke watching players roll by about 15 rows of people in front of you a fun afternoon. of course I live for that brand of adventure. I also like run-on sentences.
The response must be: the love of evil for its own sake.
1/2 chopped onion
Better still, they've a sale and I can assure you that you will not be unhappy with either the quality or the fit - everything is made to measure so you can expect it to take about a month, overall, to get your item. However, it is absolutely worth it. This is particularly useful for the wench that would prefer her assets remained restrained to meet the local norms. So many costumes are made cheaply and "one size fits no one, really". You will not find that to be the case with these folks.
On his death (despite the tabloid slavering over his homosexuality and the fact that it was AIDS that took him from us), there was a genuine outpouring of grief from the world of showbiz and the listening/viewing public alike.
What did you think of this episode?
The goal that I set — to defeat al Qaeda and deny it a chance to rebuild — is now within our reach.
Riegelhaupt (at left in photo by AK with FCR's Bender and Cantone) could have said exactly that without the rally, because it aimed to advance not site preparation work, long in process, but the project itself.
I would love you
Thank you very much for doing this. It’s been a pleasure.
Mikkeller Tomahawk Single Hop IPA
Hop presses. They were so economic, those Victorians. Extracting every bit of worty goodness the hops had soaked up
now all i have to do is draw my frames and tape up the photos and prints.
You are done!
Jackson's book is not only genuinely creepy, it is a masterful psychological thriller and a wonderful piece of literature. Our look at this group is through the eyes of Eleanor, a completely sympathetic (and yet also unreliable) narrator who journeys farther than any of the other characters in the book, even though she is only a few hours from her home in the city. And the ending is just perfect. I lovedlovedloved this book and I can't wait to read more of Shirley Jackson's work.
No, not a square card this week, but a rectangle for a change and I tried to keep it all relatively simplistic & uncluttered. Yes, I know it looks pretty square to you, but the back of the card actually extends out with cut circle detailing - it is just when the card is open you can't actually see that element at all! Best laid plans going astray I think we can safely say on that one. LOL. However, if you look at the angled photo you can see the glossy black die cuts on the back.
Socks evolved into stockings in 12th century Europe. Breeches worn by men became close fitting, reaching from the waist to the foot like modern tights. Women wore stockings held up at the knee by garters. After 1545 knitted stockings came into fashion, their seams were often ornamented by elaborate silk patterns, or “clocks”. This term is still in use today as “fancy feet” the decorative seam treatments that were popular during the late 40′s and early 50′s.
I did resist temptation, but I decided to stamp with some of the colors I saw in those flowers. For this month's Color Inspiration Challenge, the colors are: Perfect Plum, Sahara Sand, Always Artichoke and Pink Pirouette.
Have a sun filled day! Noreen and Hunter
But I have found that there are certain stamps I buy but never seem to use. They are all brand new, so maybe someone else can use them:
Bottom line: Don't compare it to Stephenie Meyer, and you'll be fine.
#4 - Awwww, come ON.
l) Where do you want to be in your life ten years from now?
Large numbers of atheists, humanists, and conspiracy theorists are raising one of the most pressing questions in the history of religion: “Did Jesus exist at all?” Was he invented out of whole cloth for nefarious purposes by those seeking to control the masses? Or was Jesus such a shadowy figure—far removed from any credible historical evidence—that he bears no meaningful resemblance to the person described in the Bible?
D went into school with some reluctance today. They had a trip to a wildlife park and there would be the usual issue of Bunny being left at school. Her TA persuaded her in eventually. Bunny did get left at school.
Dry-roast the whole spices and lentils in a frying pan until they turn a shade darker and emanate a delicious roasted aroma.
So, if you like to make dolls or would love to do something special for the holiday season, please visit Edyth's site and you can get details there.
2. To this, add sugar, salt, and milk and stir it well.
Several of my customers collect my buttons to add to their collections; and some are knitters or crotcheters (is that a word?) who want a handmade button to finish off one of their own works of wearable art.
I suggested this to my dad, who laughed at me. But he wont be laughing when I make millions from being on Dragon’s Den with my banana creams then when I have to pick his care home! *Evil cackle*
Do you have a specific charity you support during the holiday season and/or year round?
~Also, thanks again to Caffeinated Autism Mom for her help in giving me some pared-down direction to make a presentation of my own using these ideas .
Unfortunately, even though the above outfit looks like it is an awesome match…it really doesn’t match at all. Sad right? I mean, it could match I suppose if I just ACTED like it did. But really, it doesn’t. I promise. So…I’m still looking for a shirt to match that running skirt…
And, everyone everywhere, have a terrific weekend! (And don't read the Silver Trilogy. By Paul Hughes. You have been warned!)
